I would recommend this. I would prefer you to have a 2GB GPU but those are around $200. Also this MOBO comes with 8GB of Corsair Vengeance:  [PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/Nz00) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/Nz00/by_merchant/) / [Benchmarks](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/Nz00/benchmarks/)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [AMD FX-4100 3.6GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/amd-cpu-fd4100wmgusbx) | $89.99 @ Microcenter  **Motherboard** | [ASRock 970 EXTREME4 ATX  AM3+ Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asrock-motherboard-970extreme4) | $98.98 @ Outlet PC  **Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 1TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st1000dm003) | $74.99 @ Newegg  **Video Card** | [Sapphire Radeon HD 7790 1GB Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/sapphire-video-card-100356l) | $149.99 @ Newegg  **Case** | [Thermaltake VL80001W2Z ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/thermaltake-case-vl80001w2z) | $29.99 @ Newegg  **Power Supply** | [Corsair Builder 430W 80 PLUS Bronze Certified ATX12V Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/corsair-power-supply-cx430) | $35.98 @ Newegg  **Optical Drive** | [Lite-On iHAS124-04 DVD/CD Writer](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/lite-on-optical-drive-ihas124-04) | $17.99 @ Newegg  **Operating System** | [Microsoft Windows 7 Home Premium SP1 (OEM) (64-bit)](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/microsoft-os-gfc02050) | $89.98 @ Outlet PC   | | **Total**  | Prices include shipping, taxes, and discounts when available. | $600.89  | Generated by PCPartPicker 2013-03-31 19:58 EDT-0400 |
It's still in the top 25 supercomputers in the world, so it's not obsolete in the world of supercomputers, even on a speed basis. 
Mine are fraternal but look very very much alike. But I am tired of being asked if my children who look the same age, almost the same weight and look almost identical are twins.
Rewatch it. There are about three scenes where he's on screen while Nite Owl walks past him. Its his way of keeping track of his old friend. Nite Owl even says something about Rorschach following him. 
I always wondered about that table. I thought they were up for trade on all of them. haha. I thought it was a group putting up bottles for trade. I never got the sideways thing
let me guess, you're the one who drove him around right?
Like what? You've got gunk between and around your teeth. You need to remove it. Best way to do that is get in there and rub it off with something.
Someone explain what a dab is... and how to do it.
But damn can he play that banjo.
So this is where I come to talk about how awesome the Astros uniforms are right?
its awesome. Like a threesome with gaia. 
Why does EVERYBODY forget about Red Faction?! God damn. I dont want to be a typical /r/gaming member and call it a hidden gem... But it really is. Guerrila and Armageddon's engines are ahead of their time.   Edit: LinkFixer bot. Bein' a bitch. Drinkin' outta cups.
I wouldn't. I don't really want to sit at my desk except to play a new released game or some multiplayer.  I do everything else with my IPad(laying around) - but my IPad is lacking in games. Project X fulfills the IPads entertainment value and also allows me to play old games I otherwise haven't got the will to play on my PC(Like Skyrim).
Magnets. 
Which version of 1984? I loved the book, so I'd be surprised if a movie could surpass it.
Ghostfire... Foresight... Firemind's Foresight..  Calling it now, Ugin makes an appearance in Dragons Maze
Do machines feel fear?!
anyone knows the approx weight of the bike and package?
The title sounds so nasty...
well its definitely not a confession bear.
A SSN is not designed to be secure like that, it's just used that way. Same with the Danish CPR numbers which have the format ddmmyy-pqrs, where ddmmyy is your birthday, and pqrs is "random" (odd for boys, even for girls.)
It was amazing!
Everything is a conspiracy
thats true
this is one of the greatest album covers of all time. not crappy design. 
ok thanks for the info
Alright so I just tried this and felt that 30 seconds wasn't long enough. So I put on my current favorite song, closed my eyes and just started breathing like in the video. I must have been doing it for a couple minutes when my face started to tingle, I kept breathing and the tingling feeling started to become overwhelming. My face felt like it was boiling but it wasn't hot. Along with the tingling in my face I felt a tightness in my stomach underneath my belly button like nothing I've ever felt before. At this point I decided it was a good idea to stop breathing rapidly and I ran to the bathroom to see if my face was on fire. It wasn't, it was hardly even red, my stomach looked normal. My brain felt cold and my vision was shaking slightly. The tingling slowly subsided and my head felt so clear... it was incredible. I'm just wondering if I possibly built up some kind of energy to uncomfortable levels without a quick way to dissipate it or if I just managed to flush my brain with too much oxygen and that my reaction was normal. Also why did my stomach get tight. Any thoughts?
Had 8 losses in a row yesterday. I hate myselfe when I am playing so fucking badly so I punish me with more games. In WoL this was a real problem because I lost so many points but thank god there is unranked ladder now so I can play a shit ton of games there. 
There's plenty of original ideas-- although the focus at the time was the relationship between faith and reason.  So it was more a period of synthesis of cultures.  You want one? Try Scotus's notion of Haecceity.  It takes Plato's notion of the universal and applies it to individuals.  That's pretty whacked, but I think it's cool.
Anal sex in order to guarantee a Georgetown championship? That's a really difficult decision. 
So when are we signing JJ Watt to a summer contract?
Or if the have dicks...
If I were to guess, the order would be Gatsby, Daisy, Nick, Jordan, Myrtle, Tom
Thanks man
Yeah, it's pretty fucking stupid. Deaf people don't see their condition as a disability, or even as a condition.  Edit: I like how I'm being attacked for this. **OBVIOUSLY I MEANT THE PEOPLE WITHIN THE DEAF COMMUNITY WHO ATTACK ANYONE WHO WANTS TO HEAR AND NOT DEAF PEOPLE IN GENERAL**. ^^^^Why ^^^^did ^^^^i ^^^^need ^^^^to ^^^^god ^^^^damn ^^^^clarify ^^^^that ^^^^seriously ^^^^people
All kinds of institutions will try to ban these things but I'm pretty sure it is inevitable technology advancement and thus resistance is futile.  I can remember that my old employer tried to ban smartphones with cameras on their premises 8 years ago... yea right...
i dont think any sports player should make more than 20K a year playing sports
My big thing would be to look into ways to save money on food so that your money can go further each month. You said that you like to do more low-key things like go to a park or library, but it's always good to have even just a few dollars of 'fun money' remaining in your budget each month.  I think that couponing to save money on food and get more bang for your buck is your best bet. It's easy to do and there are some great sites for coupons out there that you can print coupons from at home! My favorites are  -Smartsource.com  -Coupons.com (this is one of the biggest)  -Redplum.com  -Thekrazycouponlady.com  Also, your local Sunday newspaper should have coupon inserts in them if you're worried about wasting printer ink and don't want to go that route. I know that's where the majority of coupons people get come from, but I prefer online because I can search specifically for what I like to eat/buy as opposed to just hoping that the Sunday inserts will have what I want.  Likewise, 'liking' facebook pages for different food brands and signing up for email news letters can get you coupons - tons of brands (like Uncle Ben's rice, Gilette Venus razors, coffee mate coffee creamer, and many more) will give out exclusive coupons to their FB 'fans' and newsletter subscribers!  I'd also suggest looking online at the coupon/price matching policies for the grocery stores near you. For example, Walmart will happily accept coupon specifically made for other stores (even Target, CVS, Walgreens, etc), and price match ads for other local stores. My local Walmart will price match the ads for any stores in a 30 mile radius! I just print the pages I want off of the competitor store's website and bring them with me to the register. (Other stores will do this as well, but I think that Walmart is the most lenient.)   Since you're in the south look into double coupon policies - that's where a store will double a coupon up to a certain amount, so your $1 off coupon is magically worth $2 at the register. I don't know how many stores do that, but it seems like every woman on that 'extreme couponing' show is from TN, MS, TX, etc so it's something to consider.
[Also, through out the game, there are a few times when you have a choice of what to do, (i.e throw the ball at the couple or the announcer) but no matter what you choose the same thing always happens.](/spoiler)
Trees/rocks with slings around them seem to work best for me when belaying larger climbers. 
Yea because the ethnicity of "black people" did not originate in Africa.  So equating black people with Africa, white people with Europe, that is racist. 
[Link to the video. Penn &amp; Teller - Bullshit video games shooting experiment.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=80hSXb5QRis)  No shit he cried, he took a recoil to the cheek and collar bone.
Or, you know, it could just be that male and female avatars have *completely* different models. You people are looking way too far into this.
Absolutely. This guy was pushcutting phone book paper before I threw it in the acid.  When the blade came out, it was pretty dull.   Also, the stone wash really did a number on the grind, I'm going to do some work on the bevel.
Religion and politics in general...
It sounds like I could wind you up very easily.
For those who [online shop.](http://www.lids.com/MLB/San-Francisco-Giants/20506343)
I honestly can't comprehend ingesting that much liquid.  HOW??? Where does it go?  The most I could do in a day would be 2 2 liters... of water.  One soda-y drink every week is about all I can do.  That shit's too sweet for me.  I make up for it in beer though.
I feel sorry for her. That kid is going to go through hell as she begins to understand what her mom is doing/has done.
Don't think it's like fucking common knowledge or anything...
LOL on chat earlier, I showed the "Can I have yo numba" video because they hadn't seen it yet. It is hilarious :)
Same reason people are reluctant to try marijuana. They grew up being told that this is not what we're about and this is wrong and are just hesitant to consider it. Growing up in a white neighborhood whenever I brought up rap the parents would just say "that's not even music it's just curse words and it's disrespectful". They never bothered to listen to it and find out WHY rappers use profanity.
Best I can do is 25%
Clips are limited to that length. From what I've read it's something about how they can market it as a camera and not a full video camera. You can record more than 4gb you just have to start a new clip. 
Pssssst, at a party, I didn't tell you!
There is a video trending on YouTube called Evil Pranks,  or something like that.  It's in the description of the video. You can download it. The video is where I got most of my ideas. 
It's both 
Depends on the density.  Basically it matters how you get rid of the empty space.  Since just somehow getting rid of the empty space isn't really something you can do, you can't really say.
Mark Waugh.  He was my absolute favourite cricketer from about 1986 onwards (even before he was in the Test team) up until he retired.  He was such a great player, but he would *always* let me down. it got to the point that watching him going into bat I would always start thinking "he's going to botch this, just watch", and lo and behold he would botch it, usually by some lazy shot when he got to around 20.
'twitter famous' teenagers pretending they care about anything but themselves. 
&gt; there you go again dissing grammar because your dull mind can't think of anything else.  Well, there's your shitty "Hey, look at me, I'm such a funny pretentious cunt" attitude.  That's something else.  &gt; i know what down votes are and i don't give a shit about them.  And until you realize why you should, you lose :)
Ms. Mia Wallace
If I'm paying the professor, I can do damn well what I want to do in class.
Thanks man. Always appreciate the positive remarks. I take the negative into account too but the positive is always nice. 
burning alone's ballparked at $500, and then there's the guitar.
Western Canada is booming! If you aren't scared to move Alberta and Saskatchewan are the place to be for oil.
One of my favourite things about this goal is that he picked out Henderson instead of Suarez, so often players go for the better player rather than the better run and it doesn't work out...
Or when my Hispanic students add a little "cha cha cha CHARMIN!" at the end. 
I've heard that they're used to teach English in Korean schools.
Thanks mate, and same to you for your original post!
Crows and Shock were my most used.  Plus you can use Shock on your deployed Crows and they'll turn into explosive crows.  As if that ability wasn't crazy powered enough.
Forgot about the woman who chose to die at the CDC
*shoots*
Fallout 2 has a literal colored easter egg as an item you can have in your inventory
Thanks, I'll try re-downloading the drivers. Is there a proper way to uninstall drivers? When I originally did that, I just uninstalled CCC, then re-downloaded it.
Ironically socialist spam?
---&gt; The proposed tax isn't on the person, but on the company.  Bad management is a problem, I agree. However, that doesn't justify mindless tax cuts. And although I agree that exorbitant spending is unsustainable, I don't think that is what most democratic governments do.  Capital doesn't appear out of nowhere. The total amount of capital is fixed, and is only redistributed among a society's persons. You don't make money, you get it from someone else. Big corporations use society's resources and labour, and get to keep the profit. It has been known since the rise of economic science that progressive tax systems are not only morally just, but reduce social inequality and allow a better standard of living for the whole of society. This is not me saying, just ask any capitalist economist.  Interesting read: The Price of Inequality, by Joseph E. Stiglitz
wow. just.wow.
&gt;It doesn't. Why should it?  In order to deny infinite regress it must.  &gt;The second premise states that an infinite temporal regress of events is an actual infinite,  The point seems obvious enough, for if there has been a sequence composed of an infinite number of events stretching back into the past, then the set of all events in the would be an actually infinite set.  &gt; But manifest as this may be to us, it was not always considered so. The point somehow eluded Aristotle himself, as well as his scholastic progeny, who regarded past events as a potential infinite.  Aristotle contended that since things in time come to exist sequentially, an infinite never exists at any one moment only the present actually exists. Similarly Aquinas after confessing the impossibility of the existence of an actual infinite nevertheless proceeded to assert the existence of the infinite regress of past events is possible.  This is because the series of past events does not exist in actuality.  Past events do not now exist, and hence do not constitute an infinite number of actually existing things.  The series is only potentially infinite, not actually infinite, in that it is constantly increasing by the addition of new events.  &gt;These Aristotelian thinkers are clearly presupposing an A-Theory of time and an ontlology of presentism, according to which the only temporal items which exist are those that presently exist.  On a B-Theory of tenseless time, since there is ontological parity among all events, there can be no question that an infinite temporal regress of events is composed of an actually infinite number of events. Since all events are equally real, the fact that they exist (tenselessly) at different times loses any significance  *Natural Theology* page 115  Suffice it to say that a large part of the argument against a past infinite universe requires A Theory.  Other arguments might be offered but they all have reasonable escapes (namely the appeal to entropy and Borde-Guthe-Vilenkin Theorem).  Disallowing an actual infinite procession of events is very important to how robust the actual argument is, and an actual infinity existing in a series of tenseless moments cannot mesh with this line of reasoning.  &gt;That "there is no prior state" is already what the kalam argument says in the first place.  It does not.  The three supports of the first premise are:  a) Intuition that no things comes are produced from nonexistence.  b) That "nonexistence" holds no preference as to creating universes  c) Disagreement with current observation of things (especially universes) not coming into existence without cause  These all presuppose that a state of "nonexistence" is a thing which it makes sense to talk about.  
There you have it, heaven.  Checkmate atheists.
Always like the huge rounds. What is that one?
A lot better without the stache man! Good stuff ^^
The sales tax makes up for the lack of income tax. So basically, yeah, don't want to pay the tax, don't buy stuff subject to the tax.
I might hang back a little if I were you. Not everyone is the same obviously, and she might be into the attention, but I think if a guy kept incessantly texting me I would eventually start to feel a little suffocated. Also, in person communication is just better. I definitely think that telling her how you feel about her sounds like a good idea, as does making a move, but if you change anything I'd say a) hang back on the texting a bit and b) don't worry so much (I know, pot calling the kettle black).
Everything fits into place. But when Patrick says faggot, its like he's saying foogot.
Curl into a ball in the corner and wait till its back up.
Very interested in carried away! will edit this with swap!  [i updated my swap list recently.](http://www.reddit.com/r/makeupexchange/comments/1b7jem/offer_mac_thebalm_smashbox_too_faced_urban_decay/). I also have some other items though, such as:  Tarte vitamin infused lip gloss (x3)  Just Bitten Kissable balm stains in Romantic &amp; Lovesick  Tarte Lipsurgence in Elite  Lancome lipstick in Satin Fuchsia  Various drugstore lippies (revlon, rimmel, maybelline, etc)  Lush Big conditioner  Lush lip scrub in popcorn  Too Faced Matte Eye palette  Kat Von D little saint quad  Nude Tude palette
First off comparing men to pieces of shit, i disagree. Second, the only reason you're disgusted is that you are either partially or completely homophobic. This really isn't the place to bash a transgender individual (or the transgender community for that matter) or to rant about how disgusted you are about someone else's genitalia. 
Oh yeah, that episode, If I remember, the cockroach just turned them into wooden puppets, not kill them. I don't think they would let children's television get that dark. 
You may be thinking of a [straw man argument](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Straw_man).
Eh, I would hardly consider a post on Reddit fighting for the cause. I've been pretty quiet about it for the last 9 years or so. 
Swede here. It's not that we can't guarantee that Assange won't be extradited because that there's a probablility that he will be, but rather that we literary can't guarantee such a thing because that would go against our constitution. Political interference and all that.
I use [Gentium](http://scripts.sil.org/cms/scripts/page.php?item_id=gentium) on my resume.  As for line/swoopy ones, try [1](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Zenda) [2](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Dearest) [3](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Genzsch-Et-Heyse) [4](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Kingthings-Spikeless) [5](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/PlainBlack) [6](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Portcullion) [7](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Rothenburg-Decorative) or [8](http://www.fontsquirrel.com/fonts/Teutonic-No1).
private sector.  Lots of research work for various government agencies, such as DARPA and ONR.
Was a few rows up from the court at this last year and literally ran into Celine Dion and her entourage as they were leaving early. /cool story bro
You're a nut!  You're crazy in a coconut!
If its an inconvience I won thave any objections.
I agree, but I thought OP's picture was an amusing commentary on that. Were it an actual thing I might have different ideas. Yeah the whole "lower the standards" theory is just pouring week old cheese into an already festering wound.  Also, if you thought this story was great you might enjoy the "His Dark Materials" series by Philip Pullman, I think a lot in Infinite is very reminiscent of that series.
Cock-fighting.   BTW, it's not "white knighting" when teenage homosexuals have 5x the suicide rate of their heterosexual peers and comprise 40% of the street kid population.   Words have meaning.
that's pretty true.
Unless he's taking it back for a "fix".
3 upvotes and no comments? 
I think we've found our first candidate.  Begin clinical trial 20.
While it's a cool idea, I can't think of any players who would pay to find a server.
Yeah and how off topic we get...... So guys how was Snowdrop, liquid pridey.
Starsailor are a great band in my opinion, and Way to Fall a great song. I couldn't disagree more .
Maybe all the men in my area just aren't into curvy ladies like me :)
mind if I keep this picture?
Get a budgie, man. Look at the feet, it's a dinosaur! A crazily intelligent pocket-sized fluffy dinosaur!
I was being a bit sarcastic there. Sorry it didn't convey ... I think generally jokes that work factually are more humorous than funny things that make no sense. 
It's not what you know, but who you know.   Bullshit, they're either bragging about connections they got by doing nothing, or making excuses for not accomplishing what they want. 
I know that feeling. Also, my pale skin with a reddish undertone means red and burgundy are pretty much a non-starter.
I was 6 years old.  The toilet lid slammed down on my tallywacker because I didn't open it completely.  It turned purple and I learned to open the toilet lid completely. 
Are you telling me hormones are something that's consistent?
I hope that nobody spoils the great Gatsby for me.
Yeah dude, just avoid the subreddit. It's this simple. A spoiler is going to get through, it's impossible that it won't. 
I've tried doing OOP with Python. It's kinda painful. Python likes functional a lot better.
True. TISP took me a moment and is always one of my favorites, though. But I suppose you have a point.
Typical Grays.
I recently did a full bulking cycle.. 10.55 lbs muscle, 6.95 lbs of fat in 4 months.
IMPOSTER
It's not your fault. The premier being tonight and all, it suprises me I can fucntion without talking about GoT in every sentence. 
/r/gaming
wow that was such a great ending! great job!
When radios get staticky again as soon as you finish adjusting the antenna 
i dont see anything wrong here
It shocked his hair into spontaneously growing?
You are correct, but that doesn't make the reasoning any less stupid.
This is what you get for trying to use proper grammar in 2013...our world is going to shit. 
Having also gotten cunnilingus from your dog, I can confirm, this guys legit 
http://psycnet.apa.org/journals/bul/136/2/174.pdf
Government jobs have the best benefits, bar none.  
My friend, a professional artist, made them for a project. He had extras left over so I asked him for some.
Can't you invite reporters over as "friends" to document all that they want?
Upvote for Stephen King
[This](http://i.imgur.com/QxhkZ3r.jpg) was it.
As a professional musician, i'd love for you to do an ama.  Also curious where/who you conduct, if you feel like sharing that info.
I am very mildy interested right now. 
A white mocha frappuccino.  People don't order them a lot at my store, but they are really sweet. I also can make a frappuccino that comes damn near close to a shamrock shake.
You know what's funnier than someone getting hit in the head with a coconut?...Someone getting hit in the head with TWO coconuts!   Being mauled by a shark is not very funny. So, now you all know the reason behind this perplexing phenomenon. You're welcome.
yeah, from assholes like you. thanks for making the world worse.
What's your point?
im a dentist
Makes me so mad
He's the anti-Bill Russell.
if you don't use a transfer, you can carry over 1 to the following week. You can only ever carry over a maximum of 1, so don't waste any.  I had 1 from last week. We all get 3 this week, so 4 total.  Kid in a candy store :)
This game is making me rethink rooting for the Shockers the rest of the way. Great finish by Louisville under difficult circumstances.
Heres a video of a few MGS ones http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bc-K6wMBFkY
This kind of confuses me. How does a load drop from an offline unit trip a running unit and cause a declaration of unusual event.  The drop must have occurred outside or in a common area. Maybe it caused an electrical disturbance on the unit 2 side?  Edit Second reply. Per entergy press release http://www.entergy.com/news_room/newsrelease.aspx?NR_ID=2693 it looks like there was an electrical issue that occurred as a result of the dropped load. This would imply unit 2 scammed on generator lockout or reactor coolant pump trip. Emergency generators started to repower the unit 1 and 2 vital busses. The unusual event was likely due to the loss of offsite power (LOOP)
mfw travis http://i.imgur.com/POIadIa.gif
Probably masterlooter ninja.
What part of Seattle?
I lasted a day and I was done
[Husky made one where he read over a list and explained each change.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dDytpyurv2E)
Well the way Kawhi plays, he might as well be a 10 year vet.
Well... Technically it is worth what someone will pay for it...
No problem. I'm sure you'll have questions, so please ask when they come up :).
For some reason I find this fucking awesome
Unfortunately, theres probably not much you can do without the code. You can try to call EA and plead your case, but I kind of doubt they would give you a new code. I am sorry.  Maybe try and get yourself back to your aunts if they arent too far away? I mean, it has to be in her house somewhere.. Hopefully.
When someone tells me how young I look.
Did the excitement overcome you when you meet John "Mr Excitement" Laurinatis? 
Blizzard also changed how Baneling drop work mechanically so that's one of the reason as well. Technically you can't drop Baneling into filled space (dead ball)
Not at all. 
Leonard just start laying it up...
[I have no idea what you are talking about](http://i.imgur.com/KGxIc.png)
To anyone who offers him a ticket above face value: you are not a proper supporter of our football club.  To OP: don't offer to pay above face value, it's something that is always going to cause bad feelings among supporters.  http://forum.planetswans.co.uk/viewforum.php?f=16  Try that forum, they have a quite good ticket exchange, and I'd say you'd have a good chance of getting hold of one if you check there regularly and post once or twice about it. Just remember that offering to pay above price is a bannable offence.
I can't actually launch the game because the Global version won't even open, it goes to open, the game doesnt open, I click play and its in Process on Task manager but it just closes itself before hackshield comes up
Didn't recall seeing that, guess I'll have to rewatch it. Thanks for answering! :)
enjoy your bedbugs.
But... who needs a potluck when you have paska? 
Tits or GTFO.
Just because something is true doesn't mean it has to be said. 
Looking sharp! Wow!
On a state level it could be I guess but that would still be stupid.  I see nothing in the us constitution that would authorize congress to make them illegal.
Oh trust me, it is better quality when I play. 
18 in the UK. By the time our American friends can drink were seasoned pros! 
Those I left alone. 
The 16 has an Alt 3/4 mix, but not sure if it's routable via FW. 
I would LOVE to have had a white one. Especially matte.
That part made me Lol. The majority of steroid users quit "cold turkey". Its called ending a cycle.
nah, you're just an idiot.
I have that poster, they're tour dates, the 2012 Europe tour on mine, might be different ones when you buy it from the American site though.
That's how I wish it still was in baseball. No interleague was awesome because it made the World Series less predictable.
It's because it is tar sands oil from Canada. Hence, Canadian oil.
Is that what we're calling cocaine now?
"Whoahhh... someone get this woman a hysterectomy so she can join us in the real world!"  \- A really old guy at a dinner once.  
haha! thank you very much, you're too kind :)
The Echo Tap on West Main always has the MLB package and are usually really cool about putting on whatever game you want. They probably have about a dozen TVs and they have a bunch of great beers on tap. It will probably get a little busy around lunch time, but other than that it shouldn't be bad at all.
I'm surprised nobody has mentioned Diablo II's [secret cow level](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qSlGQpvl_IA)
Whenever someone says "screamo music" I fucking lose it
not sure about the last 2 years, but it used to be run by these racist dudes so it was hard to get into the conversation there. I left disgusted. 
Just wait.  I remember for last season right before it started up at 9 someone had links to streams.  Fingers crossed
Mine came out perfect.  Keep the curd separate until you're ready to serve it and then glop it on top or cut the muffins in half and curd the inside of each half.
You're not a professional quote maker or anything, are you? I suppose in this moment you're euphoric, because you're enlightened by you're own intelligence? ^eh?
"Not really."
Well, I did, but when a source straight up lies it can be difficult. That doesn't excuse spreading false information, however I did not intend to do it on purpose, is all I was saying. Either way, thanks for correcting me, spreading false information is not something I'd ever be proud of.
Upvoted because someone knows who Armando Iannucci is
Was expecting more stuff about how "nice guys" are manipulative and terrible people, was pleasantly surprised. 
Scientific forum is not the place for those in positions of power to make jokes, especially about corruption of scientific values.
Can you even read? If so, can you comprehend what you read? I never claimed it didn't. On the issues of slavery and women's suffrage in America, Christianity was used on both sides of the argument.   You support separation of church and state? How contradictory to your entire argument. Then how do you feel on the legalization of gay marriage? Since the only opposing argument is religious, you must see the entire debate as a joke. 
"Pretty good for a spear to the stomach, saved a royal wedding though so it was worth it." [sorry reddit went down for me avwhile.]
I was speaking of one that is a mix of colors, as she is a beginner.
lauridsen sure likes to take penalities
Kind of, yea
God damn: How's this, http://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PL31FEDC90E8B50435
Idiot Nickwu getting so red eyed with his ult and diving lux when they could have just gotten the turret. Lost inhib and got 1 kill? Not worth it at all. 
Both the bishop and SP live within a few minutes of me. I'll be printing my letter tonight and personally putting it in their respective mail boxes. The one to HQ will be sent first thing tomorrow, with tracking. I like your option too. Hopefully won't need it!
First thing: look inside the controller. It could just be really dirty, or it could actually be broken.
You'd expect this sort of thing with preserves.
I have this little mini game where I pick LeBlanc and I try to KS as much as I can in Bot games, it's amusing how mad people can get.
Yet if you're chasing animals, they'll usually overheat before you do.... which means you should be able to catch them 
No. His objection holds, I just don't think it's definitive.
I will not touch that... I got off my addiction to Guitar Hero 1 year ago, going back to even something similar to it will make me buy it again xD
Hey there, Can I have a moment of your time to talk about our lord and savior Zamorak?
I told this story in another thread, but years ago I met a guy in a security line who came all the way from Colombia to see Rage Against the Machine. They found his pipe and took his ticket.
ALL turbo Subarus are known to have the problems he listed for the '06.  Don't take it like he's pointing those out as year specific.  Those problems go back to '02 WRXs and are directly caused by how the car is treated and how good the tuning on the car is.
At first glance I thought I was an Andrea/T-dog hybrid.   I was disappointed when realized it was Michonne...
Perhaps they are.  &gt; Next week the black student union and the student government will hold a rally on Tuesday on campus in support of the university's diversity.  Does that group sound bigoted as well?  &gt; How is this a conservative topic?  Double standards are always conservative topics, even if they appear to be detestable.
My Chivalry for your Mirror's Edge. And thanks for the trade. :]
I believe Romo had more ints than tds up till week 10. 12 passing tds to 13 ints. Not sure about you, but I am not betting on another four week surge late in the season to eek into the playoffs.  Especially if you drafted dmc as your rb using vbd.  I agree with Ridley, Davis and brown. I got burned on brown last year, but this year no Wallace and possibly no Sanders. Davis is definitely a risk but with boldin signing. Will there be enough targets? Plus Kap seems to have esp with Crabtree.
They announced this at PAX. It's way too overpriced IMO. $100 for some posters, a mask and some guns you could've gotten for free by hacking? Sounds like a huge ripoff. 
isn't that what all panhandling completely relies on?
Damn it, I fell for it. I was so excited about this!
The bathtub actually belonged to the Roman emperor Nero first. It was excavated along with his golden palace, and is now on display in the Vatican museum. It's actually made of the purple marble strain poryphory, which is not "extinct". It's just the only known quarries of it were depleted during Roman times.  Edit: better picture [here](http://www.sacred-destinations.com/italy/rome-vatican-museum-photos/slides/eosb_016p)
Also, why are you a VIP there if you're a scammer (acording to steamrep) and trade-banned by Valve?
Absolutely anything to do with astrology.
What's happening?   I just see a photo of an iqama ID card, broken in half for some reason?
I'm glad I'm not the only person who thought this. Everybody seems so high on Tyrion all the time that many people (not just on Reddit, but readers I've met IRL) think he's infallible and a genius, when it seems to ME that he's losing his marbles one at a time.
Where did you get the shirt sir?
Those comments were particularly disturbing.  So much ignorance and bigotry...
Yeah...it's all good though!  :)  My self-esteem isn't hopelessly crushed by butthurt hating strangers on the internet. :P
/r/mildlyuninteresting
Since it was linked on the other time you posted this, but not here, [this](http://steveholtvstheuniverse.tumblr.com/post/46648169087/yes-thank-you-for-all-those-12-silver-eagles) is the source. She's a fantastic artist, and you should totally spread the word!
Anybody know why it went down briefly?
Games. Xbox 360. Halo series. Reading. Screamo. Playing guitar. Rock band. Reading.  Horror stuff.
He got the name "Jack Harkness" from a WW2 captain that died in a training exercise. For all we know, his name could be Wesley Crusher.
&gt;This kind of joke has been used with Crysis 1 and Crysis 2 too  See, that *was* the joke!
&gt;"On guard Sir Dragon! I shall smite thee with my mighty...AC/2..."  ...and for some reason don't run away after I give them this fair warning; don't they know I'm trying to spare their life?! :p
Or use Geany for free.
Every fucking time I buy new headphones! Have an up vote. 
gtfo of here
The transparent health cross will be coming back in version 2.6 ... and it'll work on sv_pure 2!  http://250kb.de/u/130401/p/JfI2AZVFS2Hf.png :)
I think people dress him. I don't think he dresses himself.
Not everything can be sugarcoated. The bible says that God can't be around sin, and since something even so small as telling your girlfriend that her dress doesn't make her look fat when you know good and well that it does is a sin, that already disqualifies us. Grace is a beautiful thing however. Sorry that I can't make everything sound beautiful and happy.
Civil union has different meanings, recognition's and consequences depending on where you live. The pope and Catholic church are not based out of the U.S, which I assume you are given your view on civil unions.
Michigan also has a wonderful music program. Source: I'm an alumnus who won the concerto competition a few years back
Maybe you should think about this for a moment longer. I'll give you a tip. Soda is unhealthy. Apples are healthy. Craving for soda is bad. Craving for apples is goes. That's where the difference lies.
THE BIRTH OF REGULATION Vanderbilt, Carnegie, Rockefeller, and others are often remembered as monopolists, yet they radically lowered prices. As early entrants into their markets, they fought their way through chaotic competition by strictly controlling costs and increasing efficiency at every step. By making transportation, steel, and oil far cheaper and more widely available, they contributed to the rapid growth the American economy, and the creation of tremendous wealth.  Not everyone was happy with these developments. The rise of large companies also gave rise to a new class of lifelong wage workers (by contrast with earlier generations, which had anticipated owning their farms or shops). Unionization and strikes increased rapidly after the Civil War. Starting in the 1870s, workers demanded laws to limit the workday to eight hours.  Farmers, too, felt helpless before the railroads—“the greatest and most powerful monopoly on the face of the earth,” in the words of one orator. “They let the public feel their power in the fuel of their kitchens, the bread of their bodies, the material for their houses.” Cheaper transportation integrated the national marketplace, putting farmers in distant regions into direct competition with each other. And railroads gave discounts to large, long-distance shippers; farmers who sent their harvest and livestock over short distances to local markets resented paying a higher rate per mile.  As with workers’ demands for eight-hour laws, agrarian radicals wanted government action. One council of Grangers declared, “We hold that a state cannot create a corporation that it cannot thereafter control.” Another speaker said, “The time would come when the management of the roads must fall into the hands of the public.”  This call for public regulation, even ownership, marks a major shift in politics. Gone were the days when Jacksonian radicals wanted the government to stay out of the economy, to allow individuals to rise on their merits. Now those on the left embraced government intervention as a means of countering the new power of large corporations, which towered over the economy as no businesses had before the Civil War.  It took decades for this kind of regulation—especially federal regulation—to emerge. Yet even before the death of Cornelius Vanderbilt in January 1877, the modern argument over private enterprise and the role of government had clearly emerged. In a sense, it does not matter whether one sees Vanderbilt and his peers as robber barons or captains of industry; it is the fact that we argue about them as one or the other that matters most. They not only changed the way we live—they changed the way we think.
The hours at Wash U are really good too. There are tons of campuses that only offer food options for a couple of hours throughout the day during 'meal times'. And I've yet to talk to a student from another university that had food available until 2AM on a regular basis. 
On today's episode of North Korea...
I've been downvoted for saying this same thing
Personally, Michael cera or whatever was a terrible choice for Scott. 
Right now I am playing Starcraft Heart of the Swarm, but I have played waayyy too much LoL.  So like, MVM in TF2?  I am afraid that we are unable to be friends now, I am sorry. There is a bear representative coming to your house as we speak to sway your opinion, I hope you don't find his methods too... harsh.
I don't care about you bringing 'freedom". As long as you don't bring your pathetic excuses for food and drink over, I'm okay.
Hmm, yes shallow and pedantic I'd concur. 
More like Russian dota2 tournament cares about the spirit of competition and instead of giving Russians an advantage choose to split servers between us east and eu. Or you can choose to be a poor sport and beg for an advantage for your home court team so they don't have to compete.
You don't combine efforts or pool resources merely to feign moral superiority.  The whole point of non-hierarchical organizing is empowering the individuals within.  No one cares if you wander off and do your own thing.  Most couldn't care less about your personal possessions.  The anarchist caveat is whether or not you subjugate others.  And, generally speaking, anarchist support / assist the subjects in liberating themselves.  Most contemporary unions are not anarchist, or anarcho-syndicalist rather, but that's irrelevant.  Organized labor exist to counter the disproportionate control of organized capital.  Another means is worker-owned wherein decision-making control resides with the workers rather than extraneous shareholders.  Similarly with cohousing being a means of relieving dependence on lenders / renteirs.  Unless you lead an exceedingly isolated and austere lifestyle, there's nothing self-sufficient about it.  Put simply, there are hundreds of millions of laborers behind the commodities you utilize.
This right here = YES
That's because the War on Drugs is one of the USA's biggest exports.  Countries with perfectly sensible drug treatment programs have, under pressure from Washington, created their own, identical fiascoes.  It was created here, and until it dies here, nobody else will be free of it either.  They're still yammering on about what a total failure marijuana legalization has been in Portugal and the Netherlands and, of course, demanding that their governments reinstitute the good and proper war against their own citizens.
im with the suggestion for Darmatian.  i made one for my uu team and she really pulls her weight.  The moltres and charizard are a good suggestions too, you are pretty open to ground attacks.  does chandelure have levitate? 
I only play Sona.
I highly recommend getting this update! I did it thinking there would be a slight increase in performance, but turned out to be much more than I expected. After the install/system restart I tinkered with the SC2 settings while in a custom game and was able to play comfortably on high/ultra, when previously I had to be on low/medium (a custom mix of the two). Get it!!
Your first little sister stabs you, How emotional.
Not awful, it's the future dude!
I think it's because to most of them it was the only happy time in their life. I mean look at them now compared to how life was for them when they where 1-5 years old
Not even once 
Bandanas and fedoras? That's about 6 years ago. A7X has matured since then. Although I am biased of course because they are my favourite band, but I saw them live in 2011 and everyone I met there was pretty normal. Haha. Not a bandana or fedora in sight. I respect everyone's opinion, but don't say someone can't do something without proof of it.
Maybe it was a special occasion... "bad guys on vacation" day?
DAT SHIT REALLY IS AMAZIN'
You have a general idea how long it normally loads, if it seems to take a while, alt f4 immediately. Maybe that will save you
Let's face it; this is Dolan. If it moves, he'll make love to it.
Excellent use of the NSFW tag.
You would trust statistics over your gf?
Coach Patino was saying its a year long full recovery time, that is brutal for his career
Doesn't work for me :(
Actualllyyy. Technically I bought Terraria twice for myself, and the 4 Pack on Steam. So fuck off.
"I'm Bob Gustavson, the pastor at Emmaus Lutheran Church..."  Yeah, I'm going to go ahead and file this story under "Bullshit".
The guys who aren't looking for diseases?
You can outpace the PS4 right now. You'll have to pay a bunch for it though. Get the latest GPUs, a good powerful CPU, and max out your RAM. And get an SSD drive. BAM! Next-gen rig!
My bad, mis-read it, I should go to sleep.
I think it's partially where they are from, because I have also heard flied lice.
In my dad's case it was less a matter of " are you going to do it?" and more of a matter of " Ok you started it are you going to finish it before you die"
There are two kinds of pain in this world.
Literally came here to say this
Whenever I see these types of posts, I'm just really glad people kept putting things in walls in the past.
"Canadian oil". HA, it's your oil now bitches!
bullshit make up calls...and there was a travel
Now I feel bad..
he sure knows how to fuck up some Captain Crunch!
Yeah, you could have a SMAW on your back and then when you switch to your knife... You become Usain Bolt!
Seen 'mammy' and knew you were Irish anyway.
It's true, although can be awkward as hell to carry in the front if you have a fat leather wallet lol
Friend gamer with *superpower
Just curious, how did you do this?
God i hate that shit.   "I have curves!" No you fucking don't, you have rolls. Other than the obvious health issues there's nothing wrong with being fat, but god damn. 
I feel sorry for anyone living nearby and the animals in the area.
sucks that he broke his leg but basketball is a game.  he'll be fine in the long run....it's not like he was overseas and got his leg blown off by an EID.
I'm in central CA so I totally agree on this one. It sucks but I suppose ignorance is on their side.
yea found it i had limited my search too much :)
As an Aries, all of your opinions are inferior to mine. 
In reality there'd be no contest as the samurai were confronted by the much, much larger standing armies of the west. Knights didn't need to be particularly good with a bow, you had 300 archers for that.
It's really nice.
The standards for being a nuclear operator used to be higher. You either had to come out of the Navy or have an engineering degree. Today this has been replaced with basic requirements like a high school diploma, but you have to pass exams during the hiring process to ensure that you have good math and mechanical understanding. Granted you probably wouldn't be hired without any related experience, but its not as hard you might think. Once you are in you will get bombarded with a ton of training and examinations for the position. It is a very long process these days. Like most industries, it helps if you know somebody on the inside. The hiring process is often very long. It took me 10 months to get in from the initial interview.
Nuclear reactors are not like tanks of gasoline. If you ever become a politician, PLEASE read up on modern nuclear reactors and the extents of their safety and fail-safes... The government doesnt need any more misinformation regarding nuclear energy...
Completely agree with you man...EoC is pretty much okay with me, other updates just arent so great. 
Not that they're *wrong* penalties or anything, but there are certainly some *soft* calls all over this game.
lol that was a travel &gt; &gt;
Waste all summoners to get a kill while CLG gets inhibitor.. uhh...
The eggs are SO SO SO SO SO much better as well.  Fuck bunny eggs.  I'd also like to point out that the reason we have Easter Bilby's is to raise awareness of their dwindling numbers.  *Some* of the Easter Bibly's or the Bilby eggs you can buy will put money toward the conservation of real Bilby's.  There is only one species left as the other one went extinct in the 1950's, and it ain't comin' back.
Whoah Whoah Whoah! Since when is purchasing hookers &amp; dope viewed as a waste of money?
Omg, we have a mutal fb friend. Lol
Something to do with either writing, or psychology. I've always enjoyed writing and been semi decent at it, and the human mind has always interested me.   Now to find something with the both in common...
Not in the late game. I set myself up, I thought I had a perfect team. In reality they were all weak to ice/water. So difficult 
It's different for sure… 
[action opportunities available now!!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/mractivism)
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; Not sure if serious or joking, but will use as a good joke in my own hunting tactics.
horoscopes are not entirely about health... and those twins still live a different life and eat, are exposed to and experience different things  and who is benefiting from this scam? authors, astrologists, random people? who cares....  as Captain Barbosa once said... "they're more like guidelines..."  to put it short, don't take it seriously... I want to guess that you might be an Aries...
Thanks man :). I have to say that I used a very simplistic style and wasn't focusing on shading at all, but still, my shading skills are pretty bad. I really appreciate the links.
I use 2 island, 1 plains, 1 mountain
I'd say because my primary language is french and I'm not perfect in english.
Punishing kids for actions their parents took, specifically kids of illegal immigrants. Like, if you want to fuck someone over, don't make it the five-year old who was forced to emigrate with his/her parents.   That logic befuddles me beyond belief. 
I use Kate for everything other than java, for which I use eclipse or netbeans. The only feature I think it's missing is easy support for plugins. If it had full integration with opendesktop.org like the rest of the kde applications it would be even more amazing.
Why would joining a frat not be advised. They do have the most parties on campus.
You would be correct.  It's a mag for a Glock 17.  My mistake.
Can't reliably IFF in a drop pod. Usually safer to just go for the beatdown and worry about the consequences later.  Either that or a 50/50 chance you'll get Dalton'd the second your pod hits the ground.
My buddy did the complete opposite of this I was supposed to help him move at 8am he didn't answe his phone till 11am then when I went on his house shit was everywhere.
Gradimir Putin http://img148.imageshack.us/img148/4245/university.jpg
No memes.  Please read [**the guidelines**](http://www.reddit.com/r/doctorwho/wiki/policies/content) before posting.  *This post has been removed. You may [contact the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdoctorwho) if you feel this decision was made in error*
This is so awesome. 
If it doesn't sound like that while you're playing, get a true bypass loop switch. Cheaper than getting that fuel tank. You can find one for like $35-$40 shipped, especially on eBay.
1085 people upvoted this.  Faith in humanity...rising.
I think it's allanah star. I think that's how you spell her name.
What?
Oh wow that's a fantastic idea. I've been invited to the same particular group three times. I should just leave that invite there instead of declining it, thank you.
Never knew that subreddit existed. Just checked it out, and I get the same impression.
Lol, so mad. Yes me not wanting to make out with a man is the reason trans people get murdered, such sound logic.
He didn't mention anything about how many days of the week he reddits. Just how many days in general. 
That is the creepiest thing I have seen so far today
I am extremely protective of my Daddy, but that doesn't mean I need to protect him. I don't want him to get hurt, but, at the end of the day, he is responsible for how he moves in the world, who he interacts with, and how he feels about it and I can do absolutely nothing about it, nor is it my place to.
there are not enough yet
for all of three points of damage
electrician, started out of high school making money, wrote my license after 4 years, in Ontario Canada.  Had I known earlier I may have dropped out of high school, screw student debt.
I'll say it here too. Cesar Chavez was an American farm labor rights activist. For anyone who doesn't understand this comment, go to OP'S profile and look at this post original post 
&gt;There are millions of law abiding gun owners who would lose their rights to own guns for sport or hunting with such legislation.   What are you possibly going to hunt for sport that you need the type of weapon that is up for a ban?  You people take it way too far. Nobody is taking your guns away.   Even 1% since 2004 is way too much. We are trying to live in a society where people have to live together. We can't have people running around with the means to take out a large number of people. That is the Sole intent of those type of weapons. It's just sad that even with 20 kids and 7 adults dead from the Sandy Hook shooting, people still want to cling to their dangerous guns.
Can't believe Saga isn't the top comment.
Haha this really made me laugh, thanks.
Not a big fan of that one. While the bird was doing what it knows to do, the deer didnt have much of a chance.
I've had the diablos for two years the parisiennes for three. And lets be honest, I'm not careful.  The biggest threat seems to be boyfriends. I d break a mans nose if he fucked up my thigh highs. The hold ups, they stay up. Occasionally I wipe the plastic down with a little winded but it's never been an inconvenience.  I love em. Really do. They're bad ass and make me weak in the knees ( if that's what you're into). 
we need some science in here, please
Me too! I can't wait to see what it looks like on my nails. :) 
It was a joke dude... And actually if OP goes to church often it can become quite an uncomfortable situation, take it from someone who lives in the bible belt.
Darn those wayward suicidal impulses! DARN THEM TO HECK!
[oh](http://i.imgur.com/nwS9HIO.jpg)
I really liked the Close quarters maps, to be honest every other map pack that has come out has just been a barren wasteland with one random building in the middle. The scenery is very bland, but a lot of work went into creating something unique that people just wrote off as COD like.   How about putting some of that urban stuff, you know, like in a giant map? Why do people play metro ffs?
anything for a fellow kiwi :P
[Found this on YT](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=onTWl_eXOM8)
Perhaps you're right on in that generally we don't vote for pro space politicians or give it significant priority, but I'm not sure if it is true. It might be, but it might not. There's little evidence for either point of view.  Und  &gt;hunger oder curing cancer  Ich sehe etwas, dass auf Deutsch geschreiben wurde
God yes.
you should post this in /r/historyporn for bonus karma, this most definitely belongs there
And that whole "I fucking love science" thing. No you don't "fucking love science". You don't even know what science is. EDIT: What has become of reddit these days?
Those parts will work just fine. What CPU do you have? Just remember, you will not get for PCI Express 3.0 capabilities that the 7000 series of Radeons support.
In the author's opinion, a moderate position between dress (formal) and casual, and modern and retro.
Love them!
Too soon, KingOyez. 
Also born in late seventies.  Also consider myself a 90's kid.  I have a theory that the culture that was prevalent when you started getting laid is what you will most identify with.
Wow you seem strangely antagonistic. How is it logical that select army selects observers (non combat units) and not MSC (which can attack)  But it's clear that you're just here to be mean, so I'm not sure why I'm wasting time with you
2:58 = my text tone
Absolutely
Excellent pictures sir (and/or madam)!
Is it sad that I'm worried about them actually doing something?
That's the preamble of the Charter, and no Supreme Court justice has ever given the supremacy of God portion of that as much weight (or any) as the rule of law.
Hell no! Free handing on a ten dollar stone will work great. Only takes a little practice to get the hang of it. 
There is absolutely no way Gattis can play 3B at any point. And he might be able to play 1B at some point, but during the season isn't really the time for trial and error at a new position.
wearing a ring of orange char, will reduce lava damage taken by far  if bounding demons give you a fright, hide within the buildings, by a bonfire out of sight  ascend the branches and you shall find, the bed of chaos and her kind
I think it was the first to do that. Also I think it was the Antlion chapter where there were actual skirmishes on the background between the combine and the antlions, which was really cool.
I wish I had someone who could get me out of depression, should put that on my wishlist ;D, and splinter cell is pretty freaking epic :) 
Forgive me, yes you're right.  I must of have thinking of something else. If you do max out your 401(k) up to match as well as your Roth IRA, then proceed to contribute more into your employer's 401(k) unmatched up to the contribution limit. 
Evolution is pretty interesting.
Reddit: Full of nice people
I think it's really cute - love the color choices! :)
Water for Elephants was filmed here a few years ago.  42 (the new Jackie Robinson movie coming out soon) was filmed here as well. The stadium they used is called Engel Stadium, and it is within walking distance of the University I go to. I use its parking lot quite often. It was the stadium for the local minor league team (Chattanooga Lookouts) until about 10 years ago.  I'm pretty excited to see 42. A lot of my friends were extras, so it'll be fun to try to spot them in the stands.
Two strippers at a bachelor party; ass to ass.  Yeah.
it wasn't actually posted yet
Your eyes are amazing.  Very cute.  Stop worrying.
This is why Jesus came back from the dead and gave us the dvr. GoT first then walking dead with no commercials 
She's asleep! Isn't that funny! It's a chaise longue, who the hell sleeps on a chaise longue? I would know, because /r/iam14andthisisfunny.
4 pink wards around baron by Complexity lol
I was going SOOOOOO deep into the mathematic sequence, but soon found [my working out and maths was going NO WHERE](/sp)
Corporal punishment of children. Circumcision. Animal cruelty. What has been done by big agriculture to our food. Social programs. The mental health debate. Hun control. Bullying. And of course, front and center, is why we are allowing religion to influence our laws, especially as it relates to equality for all persons. Oh, and universal healthcare. And rape. Oh, fuck it, I'll throw in abortion rights, too.   /rageface
You have a very valid argument.  Duel to the death?
The gist of what I was trying to say is that facebook is a part of the internet. Most people should make the connection that anything that goes on the internet is forever. You use the internet to get to facebook.
Yeah. Doesn't quite work when the preview pic ruins the punchline.
A novel by Aalewis.
Bloo. c:
or really jammed in there. ^^nowayiwastheonlyone
I didn't see his comment, but he sounds like a dick. The same thing happened to me with Cloud Atlas, I ended up waiting like 5 months as to forget the spoiler. 
You think that's lucky, but I found FOUR heart crystals right next to each other. Sad thing is, I just got 400 health immediately before.
If you're old enough to fool around, you're old enough to talk about fooling around.   You can't reasonably expect someone to know what you want if you don't tell them what you want.
There was one hook stuck in the leg but no line. The tendons were all moist and pliable and the blood was still wet. You can actually see several inches of tendons in the picture, it just looked like strings hanging out the bottom.
http://i.imgur.com/g1mDuAW.jpg
In my elementary school, we did (just at the end) "Chachacha, ooo la la, kiss me mama ha ha ha. Chicken wings!" and burst out in laughter. And this used to legit embarrass the birthday kid. Looking back on it I've never cringed so hard...
the perpetrators were announced a while after the fact
You can just supplement your normal diet with juice.  Not only would you get the added calories, you would get all of the added nutrition.
They are though. 
Chara, don't do that, that's dumb.
So, uh... same definition? 
Sure sure. I will make sure to spoil it all ahead in here for you. Happy Easter! &gt;59
craster eats the half rotten onion, sam just watches. and probably drools. fatty.
same, Pokemon was the reason my parents got me a gameboy.....never even seen a shiny....maybe today will be the day?
When someone you knew back in school/university dies tragically and all the other people who knew them back then act as though they were their closest friend.  Drives me insane when people do this for attention or to evoke some sort of emotional response from others.
* 433 * http://steamcommunity.com/id/edoran/ * Bioshock infinite
In America welfare programmes are seen as bad or a product of being lazy, when in reality they are the result of a long labour struggle dating back to the 1800s. When Corporations began introducing small social welfare projects to stop the rise of socialism It was called - Welfare capitalism https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Welfare_capitalism
This also goes for the "wait to have kids" lecture. As if just because I'm young, I'm not wise enough to make such decision and I need a well-rounded adult to let me know when to wait.
Marriage as a religious institution is more properly called the Sacrament of Holy Matrimony.  The problem is much like Confirmation shared the verb "confirmed," Holy Matrimony shares the verb "married."  And so the confusion begins.
Better than me
God, where is that scene from the Monty Python skit: How not to be seen when you need it...
What?  Oh.
any time I see something awesome I can't help but think of mackelmore thrift shop "this is fucking awesome" line. it's like a disease. except instead of a bad disease it's a good one
A cunning ruse by Philadelphia. If you put Washington on the Power Play, they can't score! 
/r/AnimalsBeingJerks
I know you...
he ate the rest of them
I'm pretty sure babies aren't made by exploding testicles. This isn't Alien, damnit!
You are correct. And there is lots of r34 of her.
2 chicks at the same time
There is a game called [Mad Gab](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mad_Gab) based on the idea of [Mondegreens](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mondegreen) that is based around this very concept.  It is not always easy to make a phonetic connection to a homophone composed of other words when you know what the other words are but not what they are supposed to sound like.
Sorry for the spam, if any of you saw that. The service was being wonky.
It's a shame a talented but frequently injured player can't still leave a legacy in Pittsburgh.
Dawn is going to have to sell a lot of bottles to clean up that neighborhood, at least there's no wild flock of ducks in that suburb. 
Put anotha shrimp on the Barbie!
The logic side of me was thinking terrorism as in just harassing and terrorizing someone like a bully would do to kids on the playground.  If its legit terrorism of a nation like 9/11 killing people it'd be also under murder. Most people think terrorism think the mass murder type thing.  But based on SJW the only personally deal w/ terrorism as being bullied.
I'm at an age where every rookie is younger than me and players my age are on the 'decline'  I know all the feels. 
I don't think there's a larger conspiracy afoot, I feel that in absence of an Asian John Wayne, most people arrive at Asian men with a blank slate. But Bruce Lee? C'mon, he's the 20year old Michael Jackson of Asians, you can't be more of a badass than that!  Ken Jeong of the Hangover? Ok. What evidence do I have that this is much larger than one mans résumé?  You are one of the first, if not the first, to bring the plight of Chinese rail workers to my table. Nobody is thinking about that today. Nobody. They'll think VT Killer before that. How's that for machismo?  Writing this while in East Asia as a white America, those same themes you mention are ever-present: the Momma's boy versus the Marlboro Man. It's cultural, and it has weight because there is indeed an established cultural history that reinforces it. Did you have a Tiger Mom? I know I didn't.  Lastly, I can confirm that what you describe does give a pattern of Xenophobic behavior, because people do the same thing to foreigners in Korea. Dunkin Donuts currently has a marketing campaign featuring a zany wired white guy who has clearly drank too much coffee. Foreigners are given comedy roles as the pratfall and slapstick guy like its a minstrel show. So, given your description, I feel like we're brothers ;)  My advice is to pay attention to what's actually happening now: pay attention to the movies coming out of China and Korea, and Hollywood's willingness to adapt them. You should promote your country's native film industry whenever possible cuz there's a lot of interesting stuff in there.  It's still going to take a while for the Midwest and Deep South to accep a leading Asian man, and Hollywood knows this. Don't use that as a crutch, however, if you're looking for a cultural scapegoat of any women problems you might have. Healthier to focus on your home country's film portrayals.
This was the exact song that got me into her music as well. Luckily, I did make it to her show last month.
For me it's nagging without knowing what you want.
dayuum gurl.
The Braves seem low to me.  I'm biased because BJ Upton is my favorite player, but that team looks like a well-balanced machine.
May I ask what you're playing it on? I've experienced it on PC but I just restarted the game and it worked fine. 
So you're a shitty owner and don't bother to train your pets properly, and thereby as much as allow and enable them to act aggressive towards strangers minding their own business, and THEY'RE the asshole?
having your leg snap like that is about the worse case scenario
What the fuck... My dad also graduated from Bellarmine (though he probably graduated in the late 60s) and then went to Santa Clara University. A bunch of my cousins also went to Bellarmine, though I'm not sure if they went to SCU or not.
Yeah. It grinds my gears when that happens. Take your kids to see family oriented films for crying out loud. Save the good movies for date night. (Without the kids)
I really like this lecture, I must have watched it 8x already
crap. that's right. holding it is the "Get Over Here!" grab. just use it regularly, then, I guess?
And eventually enjoy your Free ban. Whoops. Seriously these are the kind of stuff that can get you banned.
"I hate gay people".
Nope, broke up with her in October.  
The north is crazy.
Actually she does I recently showed her how to download music with it.
Foot up aiming for the shin. That shit hurts.
Thanks for the reply. Interesting take. It would be interesting to hear from someone who did not know English beforehand and how the internet changed for them. I guess being able to understand the internet, games, movies, and such would be a pretty big motivator for learning English.   Though from my understanding many countries start teaching their kids English pretty young, whereas here in the US, when I was a kid, we didn't start teaching a second language until like middle school, which is pretty late. Although I have heard recently that they are starting to implement it younger at the grade school level now, so that's good.
Now they start to worry about North Korea. It might be too late. All hell is gonna break out and we will end up suffering in the long run.   I hope it will be filmed in 3D.  3D nukes = Awesome
No dude what the fuck
I think someone said before, that while you are fighting through the prison (i assume its a prison) to get to her there are posters on the wall that indicate you are already in the 1980s
Well it's official, I'm never eating at Burger King again.
Did not even catch that! 
Well, if he ever gets on, I may be swayed to give it up.  Edit. Spelling. 
After I scanned in the individual frames, I rotated and cropped the raw files with a (free) program called XnConvert, and then I used (the also free) PhotoScape to compile all the frames into a gif.
Not to mention that Marilyn Monroe was actually very small, maybe a size 6.
And I'm Santa.  Seriously though, if you believe this you haven't thought it through.
&gt;Not to sit at a desk and collect TA  Well explain this desk I'm chained to then.
Dang. Things just aren't working out at all, huh? I might look around online in general. Thanks for letting me know.
The concept looks great. You can see a bigger image [here](http://imgur.com/zT3AAPp) (originally from [Dribble](http://sarpererel.com/portfolio/instagram-wp7-concept/)).
Yes, yes I am.
This made my day. 
I've used a wire coathanger before.
And the fact that you can't specify a part of a block. (like, 12.5,64,30.5) That I do recall used to be possible.
[My favorite.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bmT5-ND7_J8&amp;t=0m58s)
Gpu won't do anything for transcoding. You can probably get away with a non-k i5. K is really only good for overclocking and that's not something that is generally done with a server. Also, K chips have some virtualization limitations so keep that in mind if you ever want to mess around with VMs.
Right guys time to turn up the heat, dispersar é incinerar  *Rey is covered in flames emerging in his resurrecion form*  brasas dispersas  *rey released hundreds of flames towards the kenpachi*
Shields still hasn't signed his RFA tender and I'm guessing Williams will be out of Green Bay after this season for age/salary/replacements/effectiveness reasons.  Assuming Shields is back, we'll have him, Heyward, and House as our top-3 corners in 2014.  If one of them is injured (Shields and House have injury history) or an opponent runs a 4 WR set, we'd need another CB -- someone that doesn't have to be enormous. In any case, you really only need one CB who can cover a talented, big receiver because almost no one has two of them.  It's also very possible for guys the size of Means, Williams, Shields, and Heyward to cover taller WRs.  Just because a guy doesn't have the ideal physique to match up against some of the game's best WRs doesn't mean we couldn't use him.
Free Coaching Thread: http://www.teamliquid.net/forum/viewmessage.php?topic_id=321106  My "teach a man to fish" advice: post your replays on [TeamLiquid forums](http://www.teamliquid.net/forum/starcraft2) with questions, and read articles from their [recommended threads and guides](http://www.teamliquid.net/forum/viewmessage.php?topic_id=284255).  Watch some [Day[9] Dailies](http://day9.tv/archives/?q=%22Newbie%20Tuesday%22), and [Live Streams](http://www.twitch.tv/directory/game/StarCraft%20II:%20Heart%20of%20the%20Swarm) from a first-person player perspective.  **Practice core mechanics/fundamentals as much or more than strategies and build orders.**
Fuck you too. Love, Britain.  Seriously though, I would love to know why you hate British humour though? As a Brit and one that loves our humour, I cannot see why people dislike it and I would gladly hear some reasons why you have your opinion.
That actually sounds pretty cool mate. I must give that a look myself :)
Cardinal Dolan pls
My lord. Gorgeous. 
***DING!***   Exactly. The social connotation behind the word is important.  Being called gay is an insult to straight people because they correlate it to a lesser person of being. (Not necessarily conscious assumption, again it's the social stigma behind it). Which is why when someone calls me gay, I don't take offense, I just let them know I'm actually straight.   When it comes to insults though? Faggot is not a remarkable insult or response to damn near anything.  I prefer "Cuntbag" or "Shit-eater" or "Fuckwit" or "A mother's genuine regret."  **TL;DR:** Read the text damnit.
Holland = Noord-Holland+Zuid-Holland(North-Holland &amp; South-Holland), The Netherlands = all provinces of the netherlands
[That... looks a bit painful.](www.bitvegas.net/?r=wilberforce)
Get thee to the bay of pirates. There you shall find the treasure you seek. 
third world definitely... 
Clearly working as intended.
Think of the dead animals. :(
Why don't we summon him and ask?  *Wil Wheaton*
Consider the source. These are the same people who hijacked the Republican Party in order to force their fundamentalist agenda on others through legislation. They deny the validity of the separation of church and state, our Constitution and the individual rights it guarantees.   The universe was created ~ 6,000 years ago, people are possessed by demons, the rapture/apocalypse is coming any day, and taxpayers should pay for their schools, where that's what is being taught. 
DOZE doze doze doZE DOZE ZOde does dose DOWZ
as did I, I can't stop laughing.
That is me right now ! :(
The amount of facial expression was impressive.
I know, we dont really need to see this that much.
Um... Pokemon Games haven't been for "my generation" since red and blue were released. They have gotten waaaay too mushy, best friends forever, power of love and shit. Ain't nobody got time for dat.
I don't think you know anything about this game, honestly.  You're talking out of your ass.
Right after Wounded Knee, [Comstock got religion, changed his name and grew a beard. He went through a lot of effort to erase the fact that he was ever Booker, as shown in some of the vox recordings. Slate probably didn't recognize him, since their mannerisms and voices and everything are different.](/spoiler)
I think Kevin Hart does a stand up bit about this.
This is the big one. Having sound in only one ear, while it sucks, is tolerable.. but having the other one flicker? On very few occasions have I been tempt to throw my headset across the room, and on each of these occasions, this was the cause.
I love this, but also: what the literal fuck. There's some absolutely bonkers stuff in this episode that I'm extremely surprised made it to air. EDIT: Literally just put together that this is airing on April 1st. Jesus. 
Okay great, thanks for the advice pork! Also, do these things eat at all? I could have sworn when I give my tank cyclops/plankton I would notice it would be bumpier where the polyps were like it absorbed some of the food. I may be crazy also. 
Looks like he was hanging pretty bad.  I know I was.
But that is the equivalence of me running around with a plank of wood. Ya its  going to hurt like hell but baseball bats can be brought around faster and with more force. Which I think this whole argument is mute given the hockey blades can be remounted to the ends of the sticks and its game over.
"And you smell like one too!"
The guy in the blue shirt looks like he is steadying himself with the tree. He may have been the driver. 
Which is funny because Katy Perry is a way more interesting and versatile vocalist than Adele.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JQU-nS5kP08
If sound quality isn't you're first priority then maybe look at the Monoprice 8323, replaceable cable, people have replaced the earpads, foldable and cheap. 
It's not a massive amount of interest when you consider how they work, who they are used by and why people use them.  The only reason APR is listed is because when marketing financial products you're legally required to do so, even if APR has absolutely no relevance which is why Wonga makes great effort to inform people about it: http://www.wonga.com/money/is-this-apr-expensive/  The sort of person that uses a Wonga loan is the sort of person that a) needs money *fast* b) needs a small amount of money to  help them c) has no ability to gain credit through a more mainstream lender (eg: their bank, a credit card). These people often default; the reason the charges are high (but not very high) is that Wonga loses money on the people that fail to pay.  If you took £400 for 31 days from Wonga they would pay it into your account *instantly* with only a very basic credit check, a month later all you need to pay is £529 back, that really isn't that much money...
Nah, that was the canonization of fantrolls.  Edit: I am [](/doze)
People complaining about the social safety nets in this country who in fact have used the same safety nets themselves and then go on to say that most of the people on welfare are lazy leeches. 
my prom was on 420 last year, it was also at an aquarium, this kid had his head inside the stingray tank and was escorted away by the police.
Are you sure you want to put some beast components in a case like that? Looks awful and is bad for cable management. Also go with a 7970 and cheaper RAM :)
Right, I had just done the acid wash, and was getting scratches on it that were unsightly. Doing the stone wash was the trick.
As someone who has lived in New York...what are you talking about (regarding not helping the tourists)? New Yorkers will practically fight with each other to get to be the one to get to tell the tourists things like how to get where they're going on the subway.
I leaving for basic training in a week and if this is true I'm very sad..
I just really think that last bullet point is untrue. Even if we do eat less than others we still have enough calories to allow us to run as far just as quickly. We can still lift enough. Many skinny people that eat less also exercise quite a bit more and therefore have more endurance. I do see why this would cause people to think that's the case, however.   They were using Katy Perry as an example somewhere in this part of the thread. To get an idea of where I'm coming from, I do not consider her to be skinny. She is a normal weight and has very healthy proportions. The VS angels are what I would consider skinny, but not very skinny, and they're more capable of running fast and far and lifting a bunch as most larger people haha.  At the gym I see many slightly overweight to somewhat more overweight women doing say, forty goddamn pounds on the hip adductor. I can do 130 pounds. I weigh 108 and I my exercise is very moderate. I eat less than others but the right things in the right portions. I don't understand why I would be considered less "fit," in terms of survival standpoints but I suppose the opposition is simply uninformed. 
*queue
Isn't the bigger problem from the US projects not open space but rather the fact that they concentrated so many poor people in one location?  It didn't have anything to do with open space or highways. Gangs took them over and turned them into highrise fortresses of crime. 
Who would be silly enough to play Ra anyway?
Probably doesn't need it... http://i.imgur.com/CTgCO83.jpg
The fairways are Zoysiagrass, which needs it to be consistently warm to come out of dormancy. Hopefully that will be happening soon! After the spring burns of all of the natural grass around the course, absolutely everything is green, it's great.
pssstt *karma isn't worth anything*
http://imgur.com/4CItOvG - Sketch http://imgur.com/E1ZxH7y - Pastels
hahah oh yes! I was confused for a second! 
Absolutely, placebo works. But why not take something that actually works to kill pain, in addition to the placebo effect that that pill will give you rather than relying on homeopathy? Sorry if i've misinterpreted your comment :)
That might be, but you may have been here for long, but you have yet to comment all too long. 
I'm betting you're not 32. If you are 32, you're bad at telling how old women are.
First off, I haven't stated a position on gun control (I'm only in favor of licensing, not bans), so you're being hysterical. Calm down. This debate is almost entirely fact-free at this point, so stop jumping peoples shit for no reason.  I think most criminals are not, in fact, super competent evaders of bans, and that passing legislation that would deny convicted felons (for example) the right to own or purchase firearms would have a positive effect.   If your only argument is that law abiding citizens should should have the right to own guns, then you should have no objection to a mild licensing procedure (such as we have for automobiles).
I'm so confused. You should elaborate. 
Because the economy wasn't in the shitter so they weren't as popular.
His middle school years were his prime.
watching aqua teen now! its real
 [M20] You are outstanding on the first and the last picture. The things I like about you most are your hair and honest smile. I want to point out that I had no thoughts about your ethnicity while looking through the photos. Personally, I'd be more preoccupied about the person you are and the things you do. I'd be glad to hang out with you, if I'd met you in the wild. You have to find beauty in yourself. How can you love the others if you cannot love yourself? Good luck! 
Hehe yeaah, I don't know. But thanks! (: 
rofl i like it
If that is weird then I am extra weird because I eat the rinds...
Alrighty, it will be, thank you both!
No spoilers of course but yeah, that ending totally knocked me sideways.  Ken Levine and the whole team SERIOUSLY out did themselves.
FTA:   &gt;Aren't people born homosexual?  &gt;The doctrine of the Church is emphatically that people are not born homosexual.   i don't believe that this is, in fact, doctrine. people are born with all sort of genetic predispositions towards all sorts of things, including, it seems, homosexuality.
Gorecki is amazing. I love, love, love this piece.
Early (decision) is truly a double-edged sword. On one hand, the chances of getting in, especially to top ranked schools, jumps up considerably. However if you are rejected then you cannot reapply for admission under regular decision. You can also be deferred in which case you can apply again. However, you must also realize that you need to sign a contract that is BINDING. When you ED a school and get in you MUST go. I'm not even sure how you would go about getting out of ED without it ending very, very badly for you. You also are not allowed to apply to any other schools in the ED process otherwise the school reserves the right to rescind your application. This is why my college counselor told me ED should really be reserved for your "dream school", or a school you really, really like but don’t have as much of a shot at in RD.  There is also early action. Early action is non-binding, and you can EA to as many schools as you like. However I don't think EA increases your chances as much to get in as ED but I do not know about admissions statistics for EA as fewer schools use EA compared to ED.   Some schools also have ED II where they have a second round of early decision prior to the regular decision deadline. This is just another shot at ED but later in the admissions process.  In terms of "chances", it only helps you, but there are just some major caveats to it. You cannot get cold feet, and you have to be content with the fact that if you are rejected, you need to move on. Don't waste ED, on either a school you are unsure you'd be happy at or a school you already had a good shot at getting in to.
Call yourself whatever you please...you're gorgeous!
You can use a razor to cut edges instead of trying to peel it, that's what I did for the grill
When people complain  When people try to find something/someone to blame   When people aren't happy, as if everyone else just is lucky and gets to be happy and you're unlucky and we should feel bad for you. Happyness is a choice, and it's fucking hard work. Stop fishing for sympathy and try like the rest of us.
&gt;Update: KAT moved back to Kat.ph due to technical issues.
He's a great director of action films, so the action scenes were pretty good. The rest of the stuff didn't really come out well though, so at a first glance it just looked like a crappy action film with cheap excuses to have girls in short skirts.  I love it though :D
Well aren't you a lucky duck.
Texas horned lizard. Spits blood 1.5meters out of his eyes to piss predators off
Westboro Baptist Church
Formally, it's "You have k cities (where k is some number). You must visit every city exactly once and return to your original destination."  So the number of cities named is the number of cities you must pass through. You don't just pick the shortest cycle through many cities (so a set of 1000 means you go through a 1000).
Thanks for the tips! I'll definitely be trying out that website! :)
He is wrong. What you described *is* homeopathy. What he was talking about is naturopathy. Very, very different.
Why ask this on the Walking Dead subreddit..?
Iwould drink more but im outta rum and don't want to walk the 2 blocks to the liquor store
You should get yourself checked.
Projection sucks.
Or captain caveman
lgacy pb morok california orange + legacy lg mantis yak for lockja
I mean, by that logic I could publicly call you a pedophile as long as I say "well yeah, but to me it means 'lovely person to be around'". Do you see the issue here? Individual people don't really get to decide what words mean.  I'm just gonna say this: It'd be really nice, and you'd be contributing a lot to the acceptance of others' lifestyles, if you stopped saying "faggot" all together. Just a personal plea.
... I liked both Fairly Legal and Common Law. :(
No we haven't and no I didn't. You've helped me confirm that the stone can heal him directly, thus protecting him from harm. I thought the jewels ability was more obscure than that, but you corrected me, so thank you!  And as for bringing up Aragorn's ability to choose his time of death, I only brought that up to further illustrate the protections Aragorn has. That is working alongside the jewel. It's just another thing he has going for him. But I think I've made a strong case that Valar and elf blessings are protecting him, as represented by the jewel, and he has the jewel specifically because Arwen loves him, and that she had to forsake her immortality to be with him. Mythologies often have these convoluted connections, but it's there none the less. 
That stare is so perfectly intense, no ice cream is needed. The vine is a nice touch too. Thanks.
I have added gameplay to original post, please be gentle, I literally just played that game and threw it up just for the showing of the controller gameplay.  It nice and short as well :-)
Job Opening?
Yeah I mean code has to be rewritten, but they can use existing code for game physics etc.  Stills it look eaysier to use existing maps/sounds/music/models/some code than create everything from scratch.  If Rockstar is able to do it why not others?
After reading this and another comment, I should share this story. In the 6th grade, we were singing happy birthday to a mentally challenged kid and some people decided would say "chachacha" in between the verses. It went like this: Happy birthday to you! CHACHACHA. *gives look* Happy Birthday to You! CHACHACHA *gives a R U Fucking kidding me look* Happy Birthday dear Robby...CHACHACHA *FULLSCALE SHUT THE FUCK UP!!* with arm flex and veins poppin, everything. The room went silent and the Life SKills teacher was just like "alright now... let's just cut the cake..." the kid just walked off like *fuck those candles.*
I can't stand people who indicate going onto roundabouts instead of indicating when they exit them like they're meant to... I grind my teeth at this. 
Press 'r', look up, piss on yourself.
Thank you mong friar 
&gt;this sub would be flooded with 100+ 10-second videos of midairs every single day.  ...   &gt;Nobody wants that.  Well then that would work out just fine since no one would upvote those videos. 
They won't get fined. Let's be serious.
I live fokibg friend time,  it is the sudoku best. 
You should! The prose is really amazing, there's lots of beautiful passages  like that.
sOoOoOOoO RaNDoM !!! 😃
The reviews on [Amazon](http://www.amazon.com/Function-Magic-Bullet-Waterproof-Vibrator/dp/B002IIFDJA/ref=pd_sxp_f_pt) are really good.  Edit: Linked to one with no reviews. [This site](http://www.edenfantasys.com/vibrators/bullet-egg-vibrators/black-magic-bullet) has a review, though.
Ok, well let's say I'm the only person making my music. Nobody else is going to master it. What would you suggest I do?
It's certainly hard to be a dissident, but I notice here more than in most other subreddits--even those not created for the purposes of debate--downvoting of thoughtful ideas that are not in line with the general viewpoint of the audience. Perhaps more annoying is the lack of thoughtful response to these people that get downvoted.   It really is a problem everywhere, but IME it's a bigger problem here than it is on average.
This is a good position to take, but it would greatly concern me if the Church ever reversed its position on gay marriage. Homosexuality is a sin. We should **NOT** legislate to recognize it.  I am a Catholic and I had issues with my sexuality in college. Through God, I have mostly overcome these problems. I have no idea what I would do if God, through the Church, said that homosexuality was suddenly okay, despite the clear biblical contradiction to that fact.
I saw a documentary about feeders once, so yeah there are people who think fat people are sexy.  (I say "saw" I think I turned it off after 20 mins cause it was disturbing)  Edit: I a word
YOU MISPELLED ATHEIST YOU funDIE!
I wanted to play it safe
Lethal or not aside, I'm guessing that homeless people are more prone to disease than people who have a regular meal and bath, and you probably shouldn't use a weapon that would cause a diseased person to bleed all over you.  So, I'm thinking mace is probably the best bet with homeless people.
I honestly think my parents should have named me Jason. It doesn't really big me . Much anymore
Just great. Now I'll never know who'd win in a fight.
really looking for more pc oriented games sorry, I already own Mass effect and fallout. 
You can buy plenty of non- GMO seed from those seed companies owned by Monsanto, and you can legally propagate it yourself.  It takes quite a bit of skilled labor to propagate quality seed, but two seasons of growth will produce thousands of times more seed than the initial purchase.  The genetically modified seeds, with the onerous licence requirements, are popular because they enable cost effective industrial agriculture.  It really isn't possible to grow commodity crops like corn or soy at a profit without massive inputs of herbicide, pesticide, and petroleum.  No one evaluates those crops by any standard other than weight, and the content of oil, starch, and protein.
Nvm. Im an idiot.
I kinda just expect everyone to cite sources and present rational arguments for things that aren't immediately acceptable.
You're welcome to come to my place for a lot of fun
Getting drunk. 
I hate that nobody realizes feminist means wanting equal rights for men and women... Not some crazy radical cutting off men's dicks or shit like that 
I had no idea that was him. Seen it so many times. My mind just blew. 
Americans are sick of funding Isreal, Iraq, Afghanistan, dirty Pakis, Egypt, Europe, Korea, other Americans, and everything else. Obama let my people go, jk.
He lives!!!
Reds as well. Can't wait!
For a start, here's $2M that could have been used to ... you know ... help the needy, or something.   http://www.advocate.com/politics/marriage-equality/2012/11/15/catholic-church-directed-2-million-fight-marriage-initiatives
Nice k/d man, im only reppin 2.00 myself, you PS3 or Xbox?
It isn't necessarily a literal interpretation of "healthy at any size."  A lot of times what people mean to say is, "healthy in many sizes, not just skinny-like-a-fitness-catalog-model."  On Friday and Saturday my combined biking mileage was [over 70 miles](http://imgur.com/NVCYGdI).  I'm a woman, and over 200lbs.  From a medical standpoint, I'm healthier than a lot of "skinny chicks" that I know.  Of course obesity correlates to higher instances of mortality.  But there's a lot of messages targeting women\* that say, "if you don't look like this model here, if you aren't a size 4 or below, if you aren't X, if you aren't Y, you are a fat worthless piece of shit."  Are there women out there unironically campaigning to claim that 400lbs is healthy and beautiful?  Yes, and there's people unironically claiming that cutting down trees causes literal pain to plants.  There's crazies everywhere.  While it would be dangerous for our whole society to embrace a "healthy at absolutely any size" mentality, I believe that a message of, "any reasonable size can be healthy" would be a good message.  It removes the, "well, I'm not perfect, and won't be perfect, so why even try?" mentality.  \*And men, of course.  Although that is generally in the form of, "YOU NEED A SIX PACK BRO OR UR A PUSSY"
I actually thought this after the conversation he has with Barristan where he convince Selmy to go along with the coup.  He just seemed like he was hiding something, or somehow duping Selmy.  That being said, the Green Grace makes much more sense, and that is where I'd put my money.  Still I think the Shavepate is doing something kinda shady.
I was just telling you not to be a dick, but I attached a sarcastic reward to it.
Two air balls in row?  GOD DAMN.
Can we have a shortened version for people that already know how to download and install this stuff?
Don't worry, borderlands 2 is awesome.
Now this is how you do it.  Launching the joke on April 1st would be too obvious.  
Pretty sure thatsthejoke.jpg
The formal "marriage" does not predate organized religion, *very few* things predate organized religion.  You're fighting for a word that you do not understand to perpetuate an argument that you do not understand.
The video is hidden. You need the link to see it, and the link is in the April Fool's patch thread under Forum Announcements, buried under years' worth of patch notes.
Twist: Porn movies disgust him!
Dude people post photos of Muhammad the prophet for shock value all the time.
C4 is already in, Bigger map comes out in beta release in the next week or so.
I jumped in a fire at High Hrothgar when the Greybeards were teaching me the Clear Skies shout and it hurt me. I had to make sure though
Wild child gramps?
New 5k PR: 26:51, I'm so excited! On my way to a 10k under 1h :D
I've tried to get 22. Ammo for almost 2 months now. A real shame.
7 rebounds in the half... not bad.
She likes the cute style of the new game, and she loved the demo. I'm sure she'll enjoy the real game. W
These posters are actually shitty as fuck
So I need a computer to patch the Rom?
Where is the spotted cow?
You should find a guy who is more like OP. 
"in this particular case"
Stop pretending that a lot of OP's aren't flamboyantly trying to get called a faggot by trolling people into calling them that. Badge of honor by some, meaningless remark to most.   It's just a joke, not some discriminatory remark against gays.
And those loud as fuck geese.
Holy shit, leaving your girlfriend because she was raped is pretty much the worst possible response to that situation. 
That's a cool gift!
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 11 months | [somewhatcleverEel](/user/somewhatcleverEel) | [A message to new Redditors](http://www.reddit.com/r/AdviceAnimals/comments/slk43/a_message_to_new_redditors/) | [/r/AdviceAnimals](/r/AdviceAnimals) | 40 | 632 11 months | [Goldd](/user/Goldd) | [WE GET IT!](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/skj5w/we_get_it/) | here | 24 | 271 9 months | [Mothman343](/user/Mothman343) | [What I have discovered after seeing all of the FB posts.](http://www.reddit.com/r/AdviceAnimals/comments/umcxg/what_i_have_discovered_after_seeing_all_of_the_fb/) | [/r/AdviceAnimals](/r/AdviceAnimals) | 2 | 169 * See **54 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/gaming/comments/1bdxpg/after_playing_nhl_13_hut_and_this_is_one_of_the/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id 1bdxpg&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/1bdxpg/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id 1bdxpg&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/1bdxpg/\) 'Help me grow')
What type of enclosure do you recommend? 
Ham shot first.
The problem with "crazy, noticeably different" is how they all affect strategies and balance in a game where balance is already extremely difficult to maintain. 
As have I. Despite the fact that I am black and white...just like him.
Lol at all the Canadians complaining that "Canadian" is in the title.  Nobody is blaming Canada. The reason that the origin of the oil is relevant isn't for assigning blame to an other country, it's because of the politically touchy subject of building new pipelines, which happen to be for Canadian oil.
I also live around the corner from A1. You should probably have noticed they are Lebanese Christians, what with all the Jesus pictures in there. Not that it makes a difference.   The eggplant dip is amazing. 
I've made 3 new cities since I posted this and they've all eventually fallen to either the same glitch, or if a residential building does get completed then nobody ever moves in (I then destroy it only for another high rise to pop up that nobody wants to live in!). I've tried every solution I can find but none work. I feel like I should just give up and come back in a month :/
..thats a very flawed mentality :P
Very cool.  Nice clear picture.  Well done.
Terran so easy, A 7 year old can play it. Kappa
whats a 4-10? sounds like you like him.
I can't help but notice that most of these aren't sentences; they are phrases.
You can download it here:  http://www.thehutt.de/tolkien/fonts.html
Philly just go ahead and keep a guy in the box and we can just play the game without wasting time on all these calls.
im hard to get a hold of because, generally, i dont want to talk to you
Unfortunately I've never had good experiences with doctors. The #1 reason I hate going to a doctor is because the ones I've consulted in the past have always been incredibly condescending and dismissive. I understand that physicians are trained to look for pill seeking behavior but that really ends up screwing over people who genuinely need help. I don't know if it's my young age or what, but I've never been taken seriously about any of my ailments. /: So nothing positive, but I guess you can learn from what NOT to do. 
Yes, yes you are 
What is this version from? 
And you've made sure to wait a moment after he attacks before you throw?  He should be beginning his landing sequence when you throw.   Also, it won't work if he is in rage mode or you've thrown another one too soon beforehand. If you've been doing that, well that sucks then.
You can make great things for little to no budget. All you need to do is put a ton of work in. With audio, be careful of the wind. Try to get it so you won't be buffeted too much. With video, lighting is key. Use anything you can get a hold of if you'll be filming at night.  Also, potato chips. Those are good for morale.
[](/ww00) Andy is Sonic.
tears *
Yes, I agree that they're separate things, but both definitions of marriage are so closely intertwined for many people that they mean the same thing. It comes down to a separation of church and state, much of the time.  It's fine if the church wants to declare that same-sex couples cannot be married in a religious sense--it's their religion, and they're free to do so. However, they consistently oppose it when it comes up in a legal sense as well.  I really wish that religious and legal marriage could be treated as different things, but I don't see that happening.
your guns arent going to help you against the police or military anyway. They have more and better weapons than you.
It really is a shame that Limbaugh created the term. That is my biggest problem with it.
FUCK YEA!.... Pics or it didn't happen.......?
Actually I thought those kind of arguments are indeed in response to the parents that oppose showing gay couples in TV/movies, complaining "how will we explain that to their child?" With the response being "hey look children have no problem understanding." But I agree agree that children don't have developed critical thinking skills; you can trick them into believing or agreeing with anything. 
liberals often fall onto the same trap as thinking that other nations can be summed up on every issue, but with conservatives it seems like it's a central tenant of their thought processes.  China thinks X Muslims think Y Israel think Z  and if you think it's actually more complicated then that you are a deluded hippy.
Nah man, as Pitino said after the game, other players have had the same injury and come back. It's going to take a year, but he'll be back.
I once ran over a rabbit on easter sunday when I delivered pizzas in college. Felt bad about it. Didn't tell the kids.
This is so cool, dude. This is great.
At least you didn't end up with a case of Busch light...
Perhaps once you have your foot in the door with your career you can look in to something anthropological. Maybe with art or monument restoration. I recall reading something a while ago about historians and such in the community calling for restoration of Babylon from where Saddam Hussein desecrated it. I'm sure they'll need people with your skills to help with the correspondence :) or even other historical restoration projects. I keep saying restoration stuff because its usually what governments like to get in on, and if you're already working with the government well then its just a matter of career maneuvering. 
if i weren't a nice person, i'd be very mean to you right now.
"The other thing I think would be cool would be to have a breathalyzer in every car." Um shut up please with you bullshit wall of text. 
Thanks for the contest. As I am a .ca user I can't be gifted with your card so I will opt out :)
Watched the whole first Sean of Samurai Jack in a day, WHY IS THERE ONLY ONE SEASON ON HERE
My mom did, but to be fair I told her to come.
[Back in business, first recording.](https://soundcloud.com/somethingconspicuous/star-trek)
I think never telling is only appropriate if you end the relationship. If you continue the relationship, even if you've learned your lesson and *never* cheat again, you absolutely *must* tell.  It may be selfish to relieve your own guilt, but it's even more selfish to make the decision about how to move forward for your partner.  If cheating is a possible dealbreaker for your partner, in essence you remove his/her right to make that decision for him/herself.  What's more, your partner may have suspicions, may have noticed your guilt/change in behavior/etc., and may need the truth no matter how painful it is.  It is not for the cheater to decide whether the partner gets to know those things.
You look gay. That's a statement that typically goes along with a lot of good features, but people will think you're gay, and that can be good or bad.
I don't mind at all. (If I were that paranoid, I would never have posted the photos). :)
There's a separate repairing award called "Guardian" which seems to be tied to the recipient being engaged in combat and getting a kill I think (+35 points) - higher than you'd normally get with the little "triage" pop-ups as you repair someone.
If you can sketch out ideas on a computer, by all means go for it. My point was more on thinking about the problem at hand, and coming up with variations to the solution before diving straight into the design phase.
Cano is going to have no one hitting around him and the pressure of that contract he turned down. He has a slow start it could be a damn scary season for him, especially considering this is a player who has had concentration issues in the past. Trout is 21 and the league will catch up to him... Whether that means a true sophomore slump or just a drop off I cannot say. The kid is a stud but its just hard to see him as good as he was last year consistently.  Braun brings his second PED accusation to the table, doubt it affects this season but you never know.   Both these gentlemen are OF, the deepest position in the sport. Miggy is by far the safest and best choice at #1, why?  He plays 3rd, a weak position. He is a better offensive player then every player mentioned (not counting steals), including Cano. He is apart of one of the best offenses in baseball right now. And he rarely gets hurt... Oh and consistency, name the player who has been more consistent then him.   Oh did I mention he is in his prime...  Any person who has a chance to draft him, and does not will be regretting it come the end of the season. Just like last. 
Nu, not the Trollarch thingy! :c
Photo-auditory-olfactory sensory convergence.
ofcourse you dont see it...you belong to the dominant majority....  thats like saying all this racism blacks and browns claim they face you dont see it if you're a white male....doesnt mean it doesnt exist...or those of the minority dont feel and see it...
Hurry and put up your no smoking signs
I know.... I really couldn't find (or am not aware of) a suitable subreddit... 
If a man did this to me, it would work. (If he was hot and had condoms.) 
Great post. Great game, great music.
Yes, it is incorrect to refer to it as such. 
What
I have given multiple reasons why he seems to be different than in the past which you just dismiss with "No." and then state it has to do with his looks. Can you support your position with more information?
HE SAID TO SKIP ALL THAT AND JUST GET AN ELECTRIC CATTLE PROD
No, it's a whole system of trails with several access points. Here I dug this up for ya. http://www.slaughterpen.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/06/SlaughterPenTrails_rev0810125.jpg
the third picture melted my heart. you have a beautiful smile! please smile more! 
The only thing to do is to wait until the Dev channel is outdated by the Stable channel. I think you need to have a USB drive or an SD card in order to powerwash it back to Stable. Sorry. :(
I'll bring the good shit.
Yeast is a huge cost.  Re-use your yeast and consider dry yeast as well. Us-05 is the dry yeast equivalent to the California strain.   If you are looking for fruityness consider an english yeast.  S-04 is a great dry english yeast.  
It was actually quite cathartic to get all ragey. ;) 
Because they're busy.
last wednesday i went to a concert of obscure baroque composers whose scores were sitting unnoticed in some library in europe until they were rediscovered by a musicology post doc at my school. the last time anybody played that music live was 300 years ago.  hipster street cred: through the fucking roof
But imagine if it got into the basement. Then all their possessions are fucked as well. I'm not saying this isn't really bad. Just it could've been a lot worse. 
&gt;You are absolutely right, the violence against women act doesn't do much to combat domestic violence against men.   It funnels money to people who are spreading the idea that domestic violence is almost entirely male on female.  Also, would you be okay with it if the government made a bill and gave large amounts of money to help white people who have cancer?   Sure, it doesn't exclude anyone but the government should help all victims of a particular malady if it is going to help any of them.  &gt;That's quite a difficult issue.  No, it's not.  We as a society believe in the presumption of incense and I don't see any reason why we should remove this cherished legal principal.
“He hid it in the one place he knew he could hide something: his ass. Five long years, he wore this watch up his ass. Then, when he died of dysentery, he gave me the watch. I hid this uncomfortable piece of metal up my ass for two years. Then, after seven years, I was sent home to my family. And now, little man, I give the watch to you.” 
Any good? 
I think he's talking about how they've won 4 straight on the road
I know it gets brought up all the time, but the Hemingway Short Story is really a remarkable little stick.
Bonitis?
lockjaw + 15 keys?
Japan don't need mechs, not with all the Ultramen running around, Specium-beaming every kaiju.
The Ninja Turtles. 4 giant, deadly turtles who live in the sewers to hide from society who only come above ground to dispense their ideas of justice, taught to them by a rat. I can understand their relationship with Casey, because he is crazy, but Their relationship with April O'Neil is especially troublesome. Why doesn't she have more friends?
Well...there we go...
Religion Vs Science. Can't argue Water and Oil. 
That's really not how it works. You won't just "reset." Take a week off.
Cry me river
considering you call yourself a violist, I would expect you to be able to keep it in tune
Prediction: Dale comes back to life and lectures the Governer to death.
It's a bigger life decision than that, even for someone who's basically already in the NBA. It's where you feel you'd be the most comfortable, even if that means being a big fish in a small pond.
And nobody comments on the fact that the thumbnail looks like a cock and balls?
&gt;Dell has the worst customer support.  Wow, seriously?  I have a dell laptop for 2.5 years and I'm very pleased with their support.  My screen was flickering..so no questions asked..the tech guy comes to my house and replace the whole screen.  I had another problem and they followed it through till I fixed it..  Their online chat representives are informatives..  This is weird to me..
It's been a REALLY long time since anyone has sang that song to me.  Not sure anyone ever has, actually.
I certainly hope so, however I doubt he will survive.
Now we'll ba able to hide them in an ABU factory...or the flightline out in the open.
I don't know off-hand, but http://jailbrea.kr should be able to tell you.  Edit: I *think* redsn0w might work, not totally sure though.
I carry pepper spray. I only wish to defend myself, not to harm anyone.
It also looks like the star wars comics
Similarly, the Portuguese você/vocês. Originally a formal plural, now the only plural in Brazilian Portuguese.
Sheeeeeiit
If you youre a guy? No  If youre a girl? Still no  I dont do internet meetups. &gt;=[
I don't believe people exist, they are just not enough proof!
what is lautemortis doing...
Makes me glad I got given my infinity.
i think it is important to find something you like. I am not a sports person, but I found dancing, and I really enjoy it. If it is fun it is much easier to stay motivated. 
I know!  It made me so happy to see that he chose that book, and that he was getting so much out of it.   You could just see that he connected with it, and it'll be one of those books that sticks with him as he gets older.   
[When I realized that was Hershel's leg.] (http://i.imgur.com/ZnqQ5.gif)
People who make fun of things people can't change such as looks or athletic ability
No offense but fuck you and also fuck me for clicking on that. Jesus, seeing blood shoot out of another human being's neck is just unspeakably awful.
Thanks, my theories on economics are similar to my theories on orgasms. Everyone should get one.
Absolutely, I would love this.  That kill tracker mod was amazing, and made it fun to keep track of my kills and deaths.  If it isn't built in functionality, I would at least like the ability for it to be modded in like in WAR.
The Hitchcock zoom!
In bc here and just the other day I overheard the receptionist at my dentist tell another patient that if his tooth got too painful to call and they would book him in as an emergency patient so that his plan would cover it... Maybe yours would too? 
CLG vs Complexity turned out to be a much better game than I expected it to be.
sounds like all the basis of a generally bad attitude towards women. and after 2 months hes already this disrespectful? i wouldnt stick around to see how he treats you further down the road.
Why don't many people seem to understand this?! It's seems so logical.
And in the newest version there is a button that toggles if the two input slots are considered as one or not, this is for a better compatibility with Applied Energistics.
You're not discussing though, you're shooting down other opinions.
It feels tedious and lacking personality. It's good, but not great like the first one. 
&gt; I would be interested in a remembrance of some sort. just not a religious one.   You can have any sort of remembrance you want.  If you want your best mate to rent Howl at the Moon for the day, and for the DJ to play Sympathy for Devil for 12 hours. You can do that.  Just make sure you have someone lined up to arrange it, and give them the cash to make it happen.
I don't see why the golden hand wouldn't count.
 I would say they're almost equal except that if you murder someone, that person doesn't know after you kill them, but if you rape them they have to remember you and what you did everyday for the rest of their lives.
What the fuck!?
I'd like to take this time to point out his recent assault on his neighbor after the neighbor asked him to stop driving his new Ferrari around their neighborhood like a maniac. When I read the story, no details on the specifics of the nature of the assault had been released yet, and I can't link the story because iPhone but I'm sure reddit will deliver if need be. 
Can't tell if serious, or perfect troll...
What would be the chances I would see you the very next day after all these coincidences? At about 3 PM did you get on I-35?  I have a picture but my phone is being dumb as hell.  I saw a grey fifth gen WRX Wagon.  I pulled up and waved actually as we were on the highway.
and if you don't like kinder suprise then i have two words for you, one of them is off!
Drop a few bucks and have your lawyer send a letter. You'll never again see mormons move so fast.
WHERE ARE MY DRAGONS!?
Well, yeah, but if we don't have any opinions than our history can be a lot more objective, ya know?
"I heard y'all niggas was havin' sex...with the same sex!"
Yeah, it's almost as if we're all human beings.  What a terrifying notion.
Aye, he professes madness of a kingdom in the sky. Next he shall speak of Giants and magical wolves, tis but the rant of a madman and his followers
well, he is canadian, he had to say sorry somehow
There are more than two places they need to sell their games.
How can we possibly know?
Not that you need your ego fluffed anymore but you do have a rockin body
On a related note, I just found out that Castoreum (aka beaver anal gland secretions) is also used for artificial raspberry flavoring... Whoever discovered that beaver butts taste like raspberries probably had a lot of explaining to do.
Copy pasta from my response below because I am lazy:  It would be one thing if every post was viewed and voted on equally like in an actual democratic environment. Unfortunately that isn't how reddit works.  It is because the content of a picture can be absorbed so quickly that makes them a problem. On reddit votes per minutes is everything. The chances of something making it to the front page depends on how quickly it receives its first 10 upvotes which are weighted as high as the next 100 which are weighted as high as the next 1000. The faster something can be absorbed the quicker it gets upvoted and the more likely it is to make it to the front page. The longer it takes to absorb the content the more likely it is to slip away from the new page before it gets upvoted.  The more submissions per minutes the bigger a problem it becomes because content leaves the new page much quicker. As I said in another post it isn't a big problem yet but as more people join the more karma whoring posts show up. They move to the front page while articles, videos, and albums that would have started interesting debate slip away never to be seen again.  If you want a good comparison of two subreddits about the same topic where one bans pictures and the other doesn't check out the difference between /r/gaming and /r/games.  [How reddit ranking algorithims work.](http://amix.dk/blog/post/19588)
[](/dj)Whatever floats your boat, Scratch.
I know and I've learned to accept that recently, but my tendency to criticize myself and think being quiet is a fault is actually the fault.
Happens both ways, Atheists act like they're black in the 40's. 
agreed!
oh, not ALL of it does.  it's an economic thing.  it's just that race and socioeconomic status are unfortunately really tied together in the united states to where they're inseparable.  other countrues aren't like this so i think it's more of an inability to relate to the crime and life of poverty 
Russian isn't a race. That's like saying Canadian is a race, or German is a race.
better sleep=moar gainz
Ah man, we need more upvotes!
And that's before you even try to drive on the roads. Worst potholes around in Somerset, doesn't help when the County Council waste millions on a car park.
You're another day older!
http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198073531903 Borderlands 2 season pass 774
&gt;blue dream  Yes, it's my second favorite strain  &gt;caviar  I fucking love fish eggs!  &gt;Blue Dream Caviar  my mind is full of wat
I think it is because he is easily the least ridiculously good-looking person on the show and therefore the most relateable. All the other people on this show are INSANELY good looking.  I like the rest of the reasons on this thread too but I know this is one reason I subconsciously like Walter a lot.
More and more and more.
now just spawn a zombie or two, and you have an army of death machines
Loved these sites, thank you! I think I'll be getting one from Houndtogs!
It's so fucking English in here.
He would use drones
Well that's good news. Definitely picking this one up. SotC is probably the most underplayed game on the list, but it is one of the best ones. 
Also Canadians.
Music helps a lot.
It's a cheap trick though... I only tend to notice the date changing when I wake up and it is that date...
Purrhaps. Purrhaps not.
The piece I ordered was acrylic and generic so I don't think that was the reason in my case.
For this I used a cheap guitar kit because it was my first time assembling a guitar. Yeah, the body's cheap soft wood, but it's really in the crappy electronics that they get you. 80% of the guitars sound happens between the pickups and the strings, so that's the area that really matters. Next time I'm definitely stepping it up a notch!
http://zeenews.india.com/news/health/diseases/obese-cardiac-patients-have-lower-risk-of-death-than-other-heart-disease-sufferers_21060.html
This is only a guess, but if it happened overnight then I would think that all of the juices seeped into the rice. At my local chinese restaurant, they take new trays of food from the back and pour it into the selection trays. The rice gets mixed even further because of this. Basically, anyone who ate the rice that day had a small taste of the pregnant rodent's secretions.  
Oh I get you. Not so much that it's something that they choose, but rather that people in general (wether gay, straight or by) don't really feel attraction when young 
Everyone wants to create their own "rogue" brew but oftentimes they flop because decks have been figured out by the pros to use the cards at their disposal optimally.   If you just want to have fun (which I hope most people want to do while playing magic) then don't netdeck and create your own secret tech and just enjoy yourself because making your own deck is awesome. If you are only in it for winning then netdecking and learning the nuances of the deck is just fine.  tl;dr: There is absolutely no shame in netdecking.  Edit: I thought that "cheap" was used in terms of not being fair, not price wise. My bad.
It has to be McNabb. Not only did he take you to the SB, he took the team to five NFCCGs.
Reading comprehension? Like most submissions, I skim the story, go straight to the comments. And if you didn't catch it, I used a question mark and the word "thought"... So obviously I wasn't for sure. Its Easter dude. Chill out, eat some ham, drink some beer.
While playing hide-and-seek and I was 'it', my friend opened the door she was hiding behind. I was standing right in front of the door. I jammed my hand into the opening to keep her from closing it, which she was right in the middle of doing. The edge of the doorframe cut pretty deeply into my hand and there was blood everywhere. Many years later I still have a scar running across a couple of fingers from it.
Yeah I was referring to the TS side of things, although I don't know any agency that doesn't do their own deep-dive when bringing people over.  I've seen brand new deep-dives even moving from one DoD program to another.  I think the reason the secret is widely transferable these days is because pretty much anyone can get a secret clearance.  Back in '04 it was required for 11Bs in the STRYKER brigades because of the FBCB2 systems in the vehicles.  
you shouldn't be opening your mouth that wide, it can cause bleeding when i got mine out i wanted to look, and it ended up tearing and bleeding. i felt like an idiot...
Aw, thanks!
I am not commenting on whether the story is historically accurate, only whether it makes sense as a story.  Executing Jesus just made him a martyr.  Perhaps they reconsidered that strategy.
Why does this lead to an increase in violence? Just due to an influx of out-of-towners?
Nah, I had it saved just updated it to 2013 for you and removed names. It's by no means ironclad, but should be enough to scare somebody from screwing you over.  Word of advice - try to sublet from a graduate student. Their reputation is on the line and you can ruin it for them if they try to screw you.
It only takes one to get seriously hurt, opened up to identity theft, or inconvenienced (with replacing IDs and credit cards, etc).  There are other more effective ways to donate. Giving to panhandlers doesn't solve the root problem of addiction and lack of residence. I volunteer to a charity that works on the root problems. Not bandaid $1 handouts on a street corner.
It was so controversial that I had expected it to be completely horrible. It turned out to be the complete opposite. Loved every second of it.  I dislike the following behind Derpy, and it ruins her for me.  Blue. Logo. &lt;3  Fallout 3. Fallout: New Vegas. Elder Scrolls series. Warcraft series (Not World of).  Yeah, the weather is really nice today. I wish it would be a little less hot, though. Been really hot lately, even at night. Maybe it's just because I'm sick. I dunno, I have boxes to move. lol  And yeah, MLP's going to kick ass this Winter. Wonder what S5 is going to be like in 2014/15. :o
Well, it's 50 Bauble Bubbles, which you get from completing each zone. Or you can buy a Bauble Bubble for 250 Baubles.
www.oddschecker.com
I love you.
Crushes, your appearance,  the clothes you wear,  how you spend your weekends,  the people you do and don't hang out with.. pretty much anything that caused stress or drama in high school dissolves by a year or two after graduation
kind of, but interested, pmd
It's the same tobacco, within minor variances, so sealing it can obtain the same result.  I've found fewer variances with flakes as they are already pressed, and age much better even without sealing.  One thing you can do is to press the loose tobacco into a crumble cake.  There are many methods to do this, but this will give you the general idea: http://postimg.org/image/t0j9nscl5/  As to which is best....bulk will be cheaper, but tins are better sooner, in theory.  That being said, even a less than perfect good tobacco is far superior to a very good bad tobacco.
I play both the String and Electric bass, four years on upright and two on electric.
Just a small bit of spam :3
Fak u Gooby 
Dude. I don't think you meant this to sound as douchey as it did. 
Two days eh? If you watched the Hawks/Red Wings game earlier today, well, what a time to start!
[**This song's for you**](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ubgRsYJxHQk)
Man, I'd rather go to the library than have to use Bing.   (Not that I really mind Bing that much, I would just rather support Google than Microsoft) 
I have so many questions about your username
I actually tried to keep this as spoiler free as possible. The only thing that might be seen as spoiler-y is the scenes from the end with Panty and Brief. My main goal was to cover the main points to create a positive view for the show. My later reviews (I'm writing my review for "Another" right now) are actually going to be heavy on plot more than content. Those I will be adding a "spoiler" warning.
She's trying to get a reaction from you. No matter what you reply with, she still gets what she wants. No response. None, zip, nada. Ex's pushing for friendship is a bad idea, they get their cake and eat it to. And we lose our head start in moving on. They know they can pull the friendship card as a crappy consolation prize because they know we still care for them.   "I'm trying but just tell me if you don't want me to be your friend ill stop texting you." - That right there, the mini ultimatum she is giving is designed to make you respond faster. You're better than her tricks. Don't fall for it.
It sounds silly, but if you can you should buy a mini trampoline. You don't have to hardcore exercise or anything, just occasionally when you're feeling shit jump up and down a little bit. It won't fix everything but it feels uplifting, even if only for a minute. That's what I do anyway.   I get the feeling that at any weight you would probably have self hatred - in that sense my suggestion is useless. Unfortunately nobody else can make you like yourself, as much as they would love to.   I hope things work out for you, and I hope you are receiving help :-)
Good Guy Pope!
Get thee to /r/Iama forthwith!
-cough cough 97 cough-
A friend showed me this:  [Bombay Bicycle Club - Always Like This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-QKj62RKBrM)
Is that the one that was shot in West Edmonton Mall?
I say go with the trilogy. All 3 games are great, especially Vice City. 
It was good until it became what you describe.
I did it without straps 4 months later
All I know is, I've never seen anything like it, in any amusement hall. 
Oooh, I am subscribed to both, this made me so confused. But I am better now. Kind of. 
You do realize most people call the numbers + percent sign "battery percentage" That's like saying "hay guise I want to fix the icon on my springboard" and taking a screen cap of your home screen. 
This is an awful picture of him
Yes. 17 years old is considered a child in the eyes of the law.  Are you seriously that much of a pedophile?
I would like to sincerely thank you for this. All my life I have been suffering from stuffy noses in the Fall time and never found a way to get rid of it. Makes it difficult for me to fall asleep too.
Note to self: implement security feature that prevents AI from changing the root password
Why would you be sick of funding a nation that gives nothing back for your investment ever and aligns you with a nation that the rest of the Middle East absolutely hates? 
On the converse side of that... if you're a "sophisticated institutional investor" and you buy a basket of $450k loans made to people grossing $20k/yr, than you deserve every penny of losses when housing prices invariably decline. Not performing adequate due diligence just because an issuer-paid credit ratings agency calls them "AAA" is severe dereliction of your fiduciary duty
One time I was working at an office that is on a really busy 3 lane thoroughfare. While I was up talking with the receptionist, I heard tires screeching and a large crash. I looked outside to see a motorcycle driver on the ground. I got out the phone, dialed 911 and ran to the scene. He was coherent and lifted the face shield of his helmet. He said his ankle hurt. I looked down at his ankle, kind of pinned under the bike, and his bone was completely sticking out. Like the ankle was separated and just hanging on by a couple strands. He asked me how bad it was and I lied. I said, "it looks fine man, you'll be ok, just hang out until EMS gets here." I felt so bad for him. He had leathers and a helmet on so that was a plus. The biggest kicker of this story is that while I was kneeling next to him I heard a phone ring. I looked around and saw a cell phone about 10-15 ft from him. The motorcyclist said it was his phone so I ran over and grabbed it. I answered the phone and the voice on the other line said, "Hey Mr. X this is John from Harley Davidson just was checking in to see how your new bike is doing." I just hung up the phone...and I told him it was a solicitor.   Either way, it's a nasty thing to see a bone sticking out but my gut instinct was to help the dude out. You kind of just go into response mode as no one else was doing anything. 
Loads more vehicles.
Melo is ice cold.
They stopped showing it after like the 3rd replay
I hope Pearce gets to be on the opening day roster. He's had a great spring. 
&gt;That's not true! Marijuana is more than 20 times more harmful than a cigarette. Now, you might say... that seems like a lot! But that's trusting the same researchers who are playing on your fears of cancer. The fact is, everyone is going to die of something, and as we live longer thanks to advanced in genetically modified organisms and new food sources, we should expect the rate of cancer death to go up. Powerful lobbying forces have linked that with tobacco, when really, it can be blamed on the consequences of our modern lifestyle. Tobacco is a natural plant, smoked by the American Indians for thousands and thousands of years. Yet, there is no data suggesting that pre-contact American Indians had high rates of cancer.  &gt;So even these duplicitous charlatans tell you that marijuana is extremely harmful. Case closed.  This is a top level comment is unscientific (makes a broad claim without linking to anything reputable, comes off as a hand-waving argument), contains anecdotal evidence:  &gt;Tobacco is a natural plant, smoked by the American Indians for thousands and thousands of years. Yet, there is no data suggesting that pre-contact American Indians had high rates of cancer,  and blatant laymen speculation:  &gt;The fact is, everyone is going to die of something, and as we live longer thanks to advanced in genetically modified organisms and new food sources, we should expect the rate of cancer death to go up.  Not to mention that the whole thing borders precariously on the edge of constituting medical advice, in violation of reddit's [user agreement](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/useragreement).  It essentially breaks almost every one of AskScience comment guidelines.  Why hasn't it been removed?  Oh yeah, because it wasn't posted by a person, but rather whichever tobacco company has paid to be known as "Featured Partner"....  EDIT: So all in all, April Fool's prank or no, this shit's ridiculous...
I'd guess this was on a rapid ride,  but people aren't packed in shoulder to shoulder.
Usually that ran out of Scoots's house right? 
The whole point of the competitive mode is to play in a competitive environment. Rules should not change.
Lol that's perfect.  
I think wikipedia explains that pretty well: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Queer
&gt;I think its 4/1 efforts are the reason we'll EVER have driverless cars. Administrators dont innovate, programmers with paid free time do.  Administrators do innovate, they just face different challenges. Programmers alone don't make driverless cars.
Before you were a mod, I sent in a banner and StB said that he had to optimize it so it fit. I'm not sure if he ever got around to it though. I mean plenty people liked it.  [Check it out.](http://i.imgur.com/NWOKG9P.png)   [Also, the comments for the banner.](http://www.reddit.com/r/MCPE/comments/18ok7v/i_believe_i_read_in_a_thread_that_our_banner_is/)  That's why I said Damn. :)
Zoya's [Noel](http://www.amazon.com/Zoya-ZP581-Nail-Polish-Noel/dp/B005ZTRZTU/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1364771941&amp;sr=8-1&amp;keywords=zoya+noel) for a lighter blue metallic  Sally Hansen [Teal-y Fast](http://www.amazon.com/Sally-Hansen-Insta-Nail-Polish/dp/B008PQ850S). Best part: the subtle, almost-copper sparkles.   Orly [Stone Cold](http://www.amazon.com/Orly-Lacquer-Stone-Fluid-Ounce/dp/B005UXZRZK/ref=reg_hu-rd_add_1_dp)  And my absolute favorite of them all, Zoya's [Indigo](http://www.amazon.com/Zoya-Polish-Indigo-Metallic-Sparkle/dp/B003O4M0NO/ref=reg_hu-rd_add_1_dp)
Shared it via my phone and continued eating dinner. Otherwise I wouldn't have posted it. Oh well.
This isn't a topic, but I hate when people tell me to "calm down".
I've read it, and in fairness it is some pretty alarming bronze-age savagery.
tuna
I am a whore for Assassin's Creed. I'll pre-order IV but the idea of pirates makes me wonder how. After the wasted potential of 3 I am not looking forward to the new setting. I know I'm being a little bitch here, but I was really hoping for the French Revolution. With all the historical figures, events (king's flight for e.g) corruption, buildings,. Not to mention that the French revolution is perhaps the most important historical event in history.  A rise towards equality and the fall of the Monarchy in favour of a government that values individual freedom has Assassin's Creed lore all over it. If the pirate setting fails I will be upset. 
There's that much censorship because discussing sexism or feminism on the Internet or even showing a woman on screen results in all the worst comments.  &gt; If a feminist came to mensrights, she would get downvoted, but she wouldn't get banned if she was asking questions.  I know from personal experience this is correct.  &gt; You get banned from almost all of the fem sub reddits, even for asking politely worded questions. They instantly start accusing you of being privileged etc, then you're banned.  I don't believe it's that simple. But I also don't want to argue with lists of anecdotes. Women get harassed online quite a bit, though, so places with a majority female population will tend to be more protective. And I believe for perfectly good reason.
How do these banks affect anyone differently? No shareholders in the bank, but what are the interest rates? For borrowing and savings? Different from Minnesota or Montana?   Who profits? Anyone?
Congratulations
Gameplay is still fun, but yeah it's not as hard as it was.
Sweet. I'm on now. Just waiting.
I am sorry, Roman. But it has been 5 hours already!
You're gonna be such a lady's man with that room
He had no chance of getting the ball, and he definitely could have injured his opponent. This is the very definition of excessive force.   It's not excessive relative how much people usually get carded for, it's excessive as measured by whether he need to use that much force to try and win the ball.
Land on the moon and Mars, and do a flyby of Venus.
What was Otts penalty? Also please be okay Ott, Youre the heart of the team
What is this voodoo magic?
fizz 
dump.  find someone who can respect others.
Spotted someone familiar http://imgur.com/9zBKyvh
We don't get free pizza?
[](/hungrygators)
As shitty as losing this fight is there are still some really good fighters on this card.   Conor McGregor is on the card and so is Gunnar Nelson. 
Disney's We3 MUTHATRUCKERS
Also the "I'm offended so you need to stop"
I've never gotten a gift!  Smile!  [The sign is me, you love me, until you mess with my Diet Dr. Pepper](http://www.amazon.com/Dr-Pepper-Warning-Sticker-Soda/dp/B008PVD9CW/ref=wl_it_dp_o_pC_nS_nC?ie=UTF8&amp;colid=3HLU89LEOBE3J&amp;coliid=I3LMSSPO4DERLO)
Uh, wrong.  In the 9 years since it's been out, it has never come standard with one.
Wow, I can't believe I didn't think of this reason before anything else. I feel so stupid now.
you can get the parts from any Vacuum shop without having to go to a Kirby dealer, all of the genuine kirby parts are readily available.
booth babes, it's never even occurred to me that this might exist or be a problem(sorta crazy the stuff that doesn't even register on your radar). I'm assuming they're hypersexualized chicks hired to draw in the male audience? Go PAX, way to lead by example.
Cook making the rest of the team suck. 
I dunno like I know she can be a bit rude sometimes(always) but never realised she was so condescending hahah
The Comedian. Edward Blake. 
I now understand all those Bugs Bunny voice references.
well i think that murder would be worse for the people who knew the victim, because when im dead, ill be in a better place or what have you, but rape victims who live deal with extreme emotional issues for the rest of their lives. I know a few people who have been sexually assaulted by people several times and havent told many. Once and a while they will have complete mental break downs because of something that reminds them of being assaulted. Im not saying you're wrong in any respects, im just saying id rather be dead than have to deal with a life time of having to think about it or deal with the emotional stress.
Yes, and I can't seem to get no where near as much smoke inhaled when using the pibe, it's so frustrating.
Argo, Django Unchained, Les Miserables, Cabin in the Woods, Skyfall
a DubStep Drop. 
I am not sure that the prop test power calculation is correct here. For starters, because the "real" analysis was a GLM regression. Secondly, the why the data is set up really doesn't seem like a prop test because we aren't looking at the proportion of subjects in a given cell but what fraction of the total cells within a mouse were of each of the three types.   I think the analysis choice here (basically, an ANOVA) is a better fit for the data and some chi square type tables. 
I bottle it up! Usually winds up with me collapsing somewhere on the floor (at home, or against the wall of a bathroom) and bawling my eyes out until I can get a grip of myself. That's how I deal with things, and I've learned to accept it as such. Just try not to hold it in any longer than you have to. 
Tosser?
Agreed and no Gracie whispering dumb stuff in their ears.
So I take it you love the interface? LOL
&gt;Go fuck yourself.  Ah, the sign having any sort of intellectual conversation or debate with you is out of the question. Good day sir! :)
&gt; PC gamers pay less for games, so it evens out.  Generally console games cost less for me because I can sell back titles after finishing the game or wait for 2nd hand disc sales if I want to keep the title in the library. This is not possible using Steam, and troublesome for game discs with fixed number of online unlocks.
thank you!
Oh ya, then they turn you into a business ghost.  
Fuck! That seems a little harsh.. *but effective*
Quick, someone photoshop Natalie Portman!
When I play league I will "/all YOLO" when I tower dive and "/all can't handle dat swag" if I get the kill. It's all satirical from myself and friends.  Edit: that's not to say people don't use those seriously, and those people are just... Wow.
437  [This is me](http://www.steamcommunity.com/id/TotallyGeeky)  Kentucky Route Zero, please!
..*et* oh? What the hell kind of demonic languaged teletubbies did you watch? *French?!*
She has no idea how to play with a dick
Nikon D5100 with Nikkor 18-55mm lens.
I would love to see you make a simple function for a custom objective input score_x=score_y.
http://openwalls.com/image/10559/kristen_stewart_smiling_1440x900.jpg) 
Did not mean to necessarily refer to it as "alternative."  The group is played frequently on our alternative radio station.  So it makes sense to us  that their music is played.  The station CD 102.5 has been heavily involved with the Blue Jackets.
Maybe, but since you're just hydrogen, why should I trust you?  
(Frac) Pleased to be in your presence.  I am former Senator (series of noises and empty pause originating in several places at once, none of which is from Fractal's head) but my friends in this dimension call me Fractal. 
Just because you made a mashup doesn't mean it's legal.  Soundcloud scans the first minute or so of an upload so add more beats/vocal snippets/scratches/airhorns to the beginning of your mashup and it should get by the scan.  Also for mixes, start with an intro you produced or start with a track that the artist gave away for free or a track on a super underground label and it'll be fine.
i don't think i nor my colleagues have ever questioned a corporate dentist's abilities, but the corporate side can definitely be questioned. these two aspects aren't always congruent in their aims of giving people the best care possible, and it seems like every time i see a new patient at school, they tell me another story of how they were mistreated at a corporate office. to be fair, there's always two sides to a story and i'm only consistently exposed to one side of it.
Vintage homer announcing.
not sure if you are purposefully being pessimistic due to your username or just unfortunately have a very sad outlook on the future of the church, but I will say the church has changed it doctrine, its beliefs, and its practices many times throughout its existence.   Also the church is created by the people, as stated in the documents created in Vatican II. Therefore the answer to your question is to demand it. We the catholic people will demand a change because our consciences (a power higher than the pope himself) tells us that love is love and that all humans have the right to a loving and enriching relationship.  Just because it may take a lot of time or effort to make the change, does not mean we should give up. Change is very possible.
How many times have you tried it?
*They had to make a law against it*!.  Good Lord.   My admiration for the determination of the average American pervert has definitely gone up a few notches.
I will forever hold that 28 days later are zombies. They are arguably brain dead. They loose all ability to inhibit action and response to environment is absolutely baseline. These are as close as we might ever get to the "living dead" in real life, so the fact that they abide by laws of nature covers any points lost for not being completely dead at one point.
http://www.nobelprize.org/nobel_prizes/physics/laureates/2010/advanced-physicsprize2010.pdf  "In our 1 m2 hammock tied between two trees you could place a weight of approximately 4 kg  before it would break. It should thus be possible to make an almost invisible hammock out of  graphene that could hold a catwithout breaking. The hammock would weigh less than one  mg, corresponding to the weight of one of the cat’s whiskers."
two people saw the same thing. Enjoy a downvote.
You're right. However, look at the many times that the confession macro has been misused. It's not easy to tell.  Anyhow, I think we both understand where the other is coming from... no need to beat a dead horse any further. Cheers!
Thanks! Here's some upvotes. 
As a rocket surgeon, this is textbook.
The NHS has been reformed time and time again.  These reforms are simply extensions of the reforms undertaken by New Labour during the Blair years - reforms that by and large, reduced waiting times and improved satisfaction.  They're not perfect, and I'd argue it's too much too fast, but people are incapable of disassociating their politics from fact when it comes to Tories and the NHS.  There is no ideal wonderful NHS that we've all been cherishing since WW2.  Hell, the country has been bitching about the NHS for as long as I've been alive.
He has referred to himself in the 3rd person as "The Crusher" when he won. 
You didn't infiltrate them, you just tricked them. Infiltrating implies you were actually in their corp and worked your way up to a director position and then stole a bunch of stuff.  EDIT: Also, in the vid when you make fun of the Phobos fit, it shows you don't know much about wormholes. That fit is made to collapse wormholes. The Heavy interdictors bubbler reduces the ships mass by 80% so it goes through small, than a microwarp/AB will be turned on on the way back to make the ship huge.
[] (/clop21 "Make sure you eat your apple everyday though!") Glad to hear it!  
Yup that's the one, awesome!
Nice proof. Some real beauty and rigor there. 
I play the game quite a lot. I think I will record it next time.
Seriously, the score for the whole episode was absolute perfection. He always does well but this one was particularly affecting.
I think just saying thanks is the best response you can give them which simultaneously pisses them off at the same time. 
You want discussion? In WTF?  wtf
well the 90s pretty much lasted from 92-03 i'd say
Veigar seems to have this kind of damage with less farm. But you don't typically run into a large hp nunu either.
* http://www.icfj.org/our-work/knight/  * http://www.unfoundation.org/features/press-fellowship.html  * http://www.worldpressinstitute.org/fellowship.htm  * http://www.cfr.org/thinktank/fellowships/murrow.html  Google is your friend in this endeavor. Search.   Yes, you get a notification when people reply to your comments and self-posts. 
No, I've always loved my homes and the yards--I'd be devastated money or no money.
How do you get patterns from pics like that? Is it a software?
It's somehow upsetting to see the inside like that.
Maybe we should stop taking everything so fucking seriously. 
i don't see QPR getting out anymore. I used to but not anymore.
&gt;or can we sub that shit out for 1200.00/year and achieve the same result?  no?  &gt;Stupid spending like this is why we can't have nice things.  you mean like high quality calligraphy? 
Well that's total bullshit.
As much as I hate to say this and I feel for your situation, this really isn't SOE's problem. As you said, this happened on vent which isn't associated with SOE in any way.   Edit:  don't know why I'm being downvoted.  It really isn't SOE's fault that there are assholes on the internet.  
This only helped them out in the whole "cops couldnt do shit im untouchable" attitude.
But it isn't.  Homosexual teens have 5x the suicide rate of their heterosexual peers.  40% of street kids are LGBT.  Think about that.  When you repeat a thing in a medium that kids live in, what message do you think they pick up?  
MAJOR SPOILER FOR SEASON 3 ABOVE.   Among other things.... Just don't click it, even if season 3 spoilers wouldn't bother you.
Taking the tube in London. 
That works too. Gets kinda ugly though.
No. Other people in my group agreed that he was pretty much a shitty person to game with. If you weren't dead quiet while he was playing, he'd get upset. I'm not some obnoxious shit-talking frat boy who screams and does a touchdown dance every time I land a headshot. I just get excited and cheer once in a while during games. As an added note, both the games I played with him were co-op. I never played against him.  EDIT: Hey, now, people. Don't be a dick. This guy was looking to add to the discussion and I responded to him. No need to downvote him for not knowing the whole situation.
Mechanical engineer.  I design solenoid valves (and accessories).  I even get to do experimental work in the lab to test my designs because I work for a (relatively) small company.
Whoo!  Afaik, you know you're fluent in a language when you're capable of circumlocution (explaining big words with small worlds). I like flaunting my vocabulary, but sometimes I forget some basic things.
It's real baseball, but its also the Astros playing.  I'm not sure what to think of this.
Why Sublime Text? What about any other editor that doesn't cost you $70?
The Kings did it to Jason Thompson as well. [video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YKP-ysd4VEU)
AD-carry would be the same as AD top/mid?
Who?
That's about how much unlimited news access costs right now WITH the issue of DMCA files missing... it would have to be Giganews prices at least... 25-35 a month.
the difference is who is telling the story. a cute bear is allowed if you let everyone know you're a scumbag before someone else does.
Still the best game to this date!
Speaking of those videos, does anybody save them? Like, the update/announcement videos that Jontron/Egoraptor put up and the shirt announcements on the Gamegrumps channel?  They're pretty funny, it's pretty lame how they delete them.
Cool story bro 
I don't think this has much to do with polyamory ... Sorry, I don't mean to be rude or anything. :)
Can I suggest that you be a bit more open-minded? You're on r/Christianity. Everyone here is pretty accepting of all denominations of Christianity and other faiths or lack thereof. I appreciate your passion for what you believe, but you don't see me ramming my ideologies down the throat of every Catholic or Arminian or Athiest or Deist I see. He just wanted a church that fits into what he believes, not a lecture in why he needs to rethink his faith.  One last parting note (this conversation isn't going anywhere), if I'm not mistaken, the first version of the Bible I use was seen in 367 CE. Not in the 16th century. Happy Easter!
this problem could be fixed if there was greater public awareness, especially in low-income areas, that there are so many ways for low-income students to get very large need-based financial aid packages.
Quite
[ggblmmghhgg](http://i.imgur.com/9B8TMEw.jpg)
R.I.P. 
Related: The bizarre believe all minorities are sweet and loving.  Somewhere out there is a black lesbian with no feet who nobody likes because she hits kids. 
If you're backpacking, you should really get hiking shoes/boots. Anything else won't give you enough support or have enough traction... I don't think work boots are what you're looking for.  [these are ugly](http://www.merrell.com/US/en-US/Product.mvc.aspx/12006M/36319/Mens/Moab-Ventilator?dimensions=0), but they'll hold up to hiking. wear canvas shoes at night
Gun control.
Well, none of these things are funny to me. Who knows, maybe I have a terrible sense of humor?
&gt; Do you think if all of civilization's records were wiped out and we started at ground zero, 2000 years from now people would have recreated the same christian god?  Probably. He'd reveal Himself to us again  &gt; To me, that is a good definition of truth.  I disagree. I define truth as a statement that coincides with reality. That accurately reflects reality. It has little to do with how we obtained it  &gt; ...it's probably true.   Yes it is. Independant reasoning implies truth. But truth does not imply independant reasoning. 
Dual channel 8 GB (4x2) Corsair Vengeance 240 Pin DDR3  and here is a picture http://imgur.com/oVb1n6f  also here is a picture of the motherboard minus components  http://www.asrock.com/mb/Intel/H77M/
+1 for an extra alternative
The same way I did before switching from a pirated Windows version. Counting the pennies in my pocket.
Those comments are terrible. While there are some sensible comments in there, holy fuck are people stupid. 
No! We need to see her boobs!
Absolutely!
They also look 15
[And here's that scene from the movie for anyone who wants to see it.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cySnG42s0lE)
Not yet. I need to find a reputable graphic designer to come up with a design. I've been playing around with a couple ideas in my head though. Any suggestions you'd like to put forth?
Value on the JDs, and your ultra mst?
Do you still have the pretentious dancer walk?
A meal plan! Tuition! $20K-60K of imaginary money for classes most don't care about, while their coach lives in a huge mansion, drives nice cars and makes millions, even though the fans are tuning in to watch the players. What happens to these teams when they have bad years because of poor talent? The fans don't watch, right? So if the quality of the players correlates to the success of a team and an increase in fans and viewers, shouldn't the talent be paid? If a coach can be paid millions, how is it fair compensation for the starting players on the team to get $20-60K in free tuition. This basically really costs the university nothing to let them sit down in a mostly empty lecture hall or classroom and have some grub to eat.  Wanna try again?
when did GGG posts become about nice guy things instead of nice guy stoner things?
Cars have. 305 naturally aspirated V6s. Turbos being used in mainstream cars to get the power of a bigger engine with the efficiency of a small one. Batteries and combustion engines working together. The tech to prevent cars from having their brakes lock up, tires spin out and lose control while keeping me in absolute comfort? 
I know, what a loser for doing what he wants. He should be ashamed of himself for getting enjoyment out of something.
fuck the upvote marry the yo-yo and kill the wife
brb
It's been 1st of april here only for like an hour
Yes. Yes you can. The big problem is it typically voids the warranty. So if you choose to do so run it a bit test it make sure its good then crack it open.
I have seen this play at least 100 times, and I knew what I was expecting before opening the link, but I still laughed out loud. The moment Sanchize's face hits the butt of his guard is poster-worthy.
Soupy - The Wonder Years  Vincent - The Acacia Strain  Jeremy - Touche Amore  Tommy, Paul &amp; Dan - Between the Buried and Me
damn it chara that was dumb. i dont hate the embellishing call though.
Their very nature. Their culture. Their (low) collective intellect.
I always considered this a catch 21, One who's more familiar with the material at the downfall of cognitive ability or vis versa.  I'd like to see how the experiment was done, to see if the the people who had a good nights rest studied for 8 hours less or if they were already prepared and just had no need to cram all night.  The week of finials I double the recommended dose of fish oil, I really believe this helps.
I have never heard this. Ever.
I'M FURRIOUS.
I think I am going to give them away to the lovely peeps on the subreddit ^^ Thanks for the idea :D
You just wanted to use that word! Your comment serves no purpose!
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v02WFh_Kdl0&amp;t=2m20s FOUND IT!
Haha yeah, fair enough. You have a lot of languages in your flair. Are you not at a reading and writing level in any of them yet?
Were you born in America? If so PLEASE be our president.  EDIT: why was this downvoted... that wasn't sarcasm
I'll be in the room when you're ready :)
How much? please elaborate on how much money is given to Palestine SOLELY by the US for a)General aid and b)to buy weapons from US.
Hitting my head on something. And the implications of unpaid internships. 
That has worked =/= that could work
Wow. Talk about being overly dramatic. People just say veteran when they went through something. 35 year veteran of a job. Veteran of college. Whatever. 
I mean, it is a form of alternative and isn't typical/all just rap. But I now see what you meant.
That's when you take a job that is related to your field but beneath the one you are aiming for.  Any work experience is going to help fill that gap.
Dont worry we know the truth about her 
My grandmother has brain cancer and I've been trying so hard to convince my mom to toke her up, but she's highly stubborn. Fuck. any ideas?
